Say goodbye to the Fitzgerald's and give a warm welcome to Las Vegas's hottest new Hotel & Casino, The D!!!
The D stands for Downtown, Derek (Derek Stevens, one of the owners who also owns the Golden Gate Hotel and Casino at the other end of Fremont Street), and Detroit, a nod to Derek's home town.
Although I didn't stay in the hotel, the casino has already made significant changes, all for the better.
The casino has "Dancing Dealers" similar to the Golden Gate.
The women here wear white outfits, in contrast to the black worn at the Golden Gate.
The tiny bar was removed, and replaced with a sleek, sophisticated, and well-stocked Long Bar conveniently located right at the casino's main entrance.
I went to the D on St. Patrick's Day (its second day of operation).
The casino was still using chips from the Fitz, but the new D table felts were colorful, hip and jazzy.
I played a few hands of Let-It-Ride, and got the D's commemorative green t-shirt for St. Patty's Day.
Derek in a green blazer  was there with his posse of little costumed leprechauns...really funny!!!
Because I love the Golden Gate the most of all Las Vegas casinos, I know wondrous and amazing changes are in store for the new D Hotel & Casino.
I can't wait to see the D transform into the entertainment jewel of Downtown Las Vegas.
Visit the D today!!

I have mad love for downtown.
Part of that love is nostalgia.
There is my own personal nostalgia, and nostalgia for historic Las Vegas.
The owners of the Golden Gate decided to preserve history at 1 Fremont Street.
They went the other way when they acquired Fitzgerald's.
I like that people are interested in downtown and willing to put money into its improvement.
I want it to continue to grow and evolve.
However, I think it would be tragic if my downtown Vegas got Nerfed.
Downtown is 'come as you are.
'  That makes me happy.
I've observed that there are two poles of intention with night life.
People want to have a good time and/or to see and be seen.
The spirit of downtown is very much the former in my opinion.
People shed their dignity on Fremont Street, unload their self-consciousness, and commune with their fellow humans.
If it becomes more like the strip, expensive, stratified, and snobby, then there's no point in going downtown.
I think  The D or D's or whatever sounds like an attempt to be modern and edgy.
Whatever that means.
It sounds temporary to me.

Props to the new owners for beginning the transformation, but the current changes leave this place wondering what it is and who it's for.
The Long Bar is cool, after that a lot of the rest is the same and the concept is really confused as a result of part of the place being changed and the rest left the same.
For example:  The name-  OK the new name is "The D", right?
Well the Fitzgeralds cheesy signage is still everywhere, rainbows etc.
The Dancers - Not hot by vegas standards but seemed to be working it.
The problem is the space is WAY too bright and too big to make this concept work.
The Tables/games-  Plus for lots of blackjack tables but terrible rules continue to ruin blackjack games in LV and The D is no exception.
No surrender on a shoe game?
Please!
Games aren't playable.
The sign on the side of the hotel with a girl in a sexy dress out for a night on the town seems to indicate that this is some kind of sophisticated upscale location.
Yet the place still looks run down and the 60 y/o gentlemen at my table complained that the wallpaper in his room is peeling off.
Again, what is this place trying to be?
Are they claiming they're an upscale hotel?
The Music - Good music, but it is blasting at a super high decible level.
The 2nd floor - Left unchanged.
It's still terrible.
Overall it seems to me like the place is slightly better, however, I feel like it's not somewhere i'd frequent mainly due to poor table rules favoring the house.
It seems like the new blaring music might also alienate some of the current older repeat customers.
What exactly is this place trying to be?
Who is the target market?

Well, this is a tough one for me.
For one, I was arriving on a Sunday checking out on Monday so I got a 50 dollar room that was upgraded to a suite, which was, well.. SWEET.
The room was fantastic, but since it isn't a 50 dollar room I'm left a bit unsure.
The bad though, the rest of the place.
I guess the slow transformation from The Fitz to The D is still ongoing.
Most of the place still says Fitz.
The parking is free if you are staying here, but paid for everyone else.
The front desk is way too slow.
They need more or quicker staff.
Checking in and out took way too long compared to other hotels in Vegas.
I guess the price of Internet access has also gone up in Vegas.
I first thought $11.99 was expensive, but I see that the Venetian is now charging $16.00!
So props to them for that.
The rest of the place still feels a little broke down, but clearly they are trying to do something so I'm giving them a 3 star review for now.

Sure, The Fitz was a bit of a dive.
Its rooms desperately need renovation and the casino wasn't exactly pristine.
But there were three things that kept me coming back:  1.
$2 and $3 blackjack tables  2.
Bonus Poker Video Poker that paid two credits on two pair 3.
$2 drafts upstairs at The Vue bar where you could sit outside on a balcony overlooking Fremont Street.
Now that it's The D, sure it's great that those renovations will happen, but:  1.
The table limits will be similar to the Golden Gate's--$5 minimum even on a weekday morning 2.
The video poker has already been changed to pay one credit on two pair 3.
I tried to get a draft beer upstairs at The Vue and they charged me $4 for a smaller glass than The Fitz used to give me.
I'll give The D a few more chances, but by first impressions, I'm disappointed.

Formerly "The Fitzgerald," The D is now becoming one of the up and comers of Fremont Street.
I'm torn here.
I like the gritty neon of Downtown and think that the casinos should embrace it to set them apart from The Strip.
On the other hand, I hate the tiny, smoky, raggedy mess that Downtown casinos tend to be.
I wish The D (an awful name, by the way) would have updated its neon on the outside and classed up the inside, much like The Golden Nugget has done.
With that being said, I am a fan of what they are doing with the inside of the casino.
I really enjoyed the Longbar and spent a little bit of time there with some friends from out of town.
They even had a glass of (cheap) white wine for 4 bucks!
And they were generous with the pour!
Although I'm sad about the name change and the loss of neon, I'm going to go ahead and say this might be one of my new favorite Downtown casinos.

been staying/gamblin' at Fitz for years.
Fitz got bought by the owners of my favorite casino--the golden gate.
the new long bar is very impressive with tons of big screens.
i forgot how tiny the cashiers cage & buffet/grill are--intolerable & i feel sorry for the slammed employees, & patrons waiting forever in line.
that super-sucks and the new owners need to correct  these areas by expanding them pronto.
drink service for the entire pit area was weak 10pm saturday nite(i fled the craps table cuz neglectful drink service is bad luck for me).
i overheard some blue hairs complaining about the sexy dealers go go dancing to loud rap music.
if yer reading this, yer young enough to dig it too.
i think there's like 30 floors; their high-speed elevators are as good as it gets.
no lotion in the rooms.

I think The D sucks.
Fitzgeralds was more comfortable.The staff was great and friendly,the waitresses came around a lot more.there were more places to make change and cash in your tickets.I miss the Blarney Stone.I was there in April.Atmosphere was cold.

It's not the Flamingo or the Paris hotel but it did the job for us weary travelers.
Drove into Las Vegas late late around 3:30am.
I've always stayed on the strip while in Vegas but this time I was mesmerized by Old Las Vegas downtown.
It was like seeing a new but old part of a city I've visited time and time again.
The hotel rooms need renovating but all in all it was a decent night's stay.
Just happy to lay my head down.
Wish I had more time to see the experience the hotel and downtown but alas we had other things to do.
The next morning our front desk clerk was gracious and friendly.
I will be back soon to walk around downtown and see the hotel again.

First time in downtown Las Vegas, and I just loved it!!!!!
Friendlier and more genuine people!
From now on, that's where I will stay each time I go to fabulous Las Vegas!
The D was outstanding (a little confusing though because its former name (Fitzgeralds) is still pretty much everywhere!).
Fast check-in/check-out.
Extremely friendly staff.
Free breakfast during my 2-night stay.
Clean and spacious room at top price ($29!).
HELL, YEAH...
I WILL BE BACK!!!!!!!

Grading value, A.
Gambling, B.
Rooms are C. The name is... a D.

Downtown Vegas is a circus.
I really like The D (formerly Fitzgeralds).
the staff from the hosts, waitresses, and dealers were all friendly.
The new Long Bar is a sight to see.
I could spent a night huddled up to a video poker machine watching a game.
It's still in a state of flux in terms of the name change, but I think that the new proposed changes I've read about, the place will be one of the nicer spots on Fremont.
Definitely worth a trip to see if you are Downtown.

Came downtown for Yelp Spring Break and took part in their promotions.
Even without our free drink, the prices are cheap.
A premium drink is half the price of any other bar around.
Although it might not be part of the handcrafted movement, they will get your night started.
With all the renovations, the interior is looking nice.
The Long Bar is close to the front and is well staffed.
We blitzed them in a large group and they took great care of us.
If this is any indication of what downtown is about to turn into then I might find myself wandering around this area more often.

I was here at the D to redeem my Yelp Spring Break coupon at their famous Longbar.
Initially I had got my drink earlier in the evening but some of my Yelp friends in our party had not so after hitting a few bars, we ended up back at the D for a bathroom break and to redeem their coupons.
As we were waiting for the drinks, one person left to go gamble...which I believe is not really conducive to a bar crawl.
I noticed that he was at the blackjack table so a few of us went over to see how he was doing.
Then next thing I knew, another guy joined him and then another.
OK...pub/bar crawl on hold!
Then the funniest thing happened.
The dealer was hot!...as in she was a busting machine.
There were hardly any bad beats the whole time even though the D dealt from a multideck shoe.
Usually if a dealer is this hot, the casino will swap him/her out with someone else to change the tide...but that night, the dealer stayed and my friends kept winning!
We all left happy and with some modest winnings from our time here.
Thank you to the casino formerly known as Fitzgeralds for our free drinks and for a great gambling experience!

Was at the Yelp Spring Break and walked across Fremont Street to their "outdoor bar" to get a couple of beers to take back to the event.
One Coors Light and one Budweiser = $12.
Yeah, no thanks.

I seriously want to thank them for making me feel extra special.
I was so glad to have their EXTREMELY generous Yelp deal which was a free PREMIUM drink!
I mean, a bar that can offer a free premium drink is a keeper in my book!
The staff at the Longbar, especially my bartender was extremely helpful and patient with me.
He rounded up my orders and being partially intoxicated, humored my bad jokes and my little more than normally loud tone.
So thank you bartender for putting up with my obnoxiousness.
Another thing I'd like to commend them is their staff!
I've traveled through casinos talking to pit bosses left and right (more than I ever have since I've lived here) and ALL the pit bosses were snobby, rude, and mean!
They treated me like I wasn't worth the time in the world since I wasn't partaking in any practice of putting my money in their pockets.
But at the D the pit boss was SO NICE AND FRIENDLY!
He was willing to assist me as I partook on my mission to complete the scavenger hunt!
He was so cheery and humorous and most of all willing to help me out.
Thank you D for you're wonderful service!

YAY for the FREE premium drink we got!!!
Bartender was cool to take all our orders and my yummy drink came in a tall glass!!!
YESSSSSS!!!!!!!!!!
This place is pretty big!
You have stuff on street level and more stuff upstairs.
Had to use the bathroom (upstairs) and while I was there, Sonny won!
WHAT?!
Where's my luck, D?

Meh was just there to get free yelp drinks..Just another Casino

OK, so I work here and I'm biased.
The new decor and the old school Vegas feel of the place make it the perfect stop for dinner, a show, and gaming downtown.
Check out the Longbar and the big screen TVs, or enjoy the Dancing Dealers in the pit area.
Anyway you look at it, the D is a A+.

Ah yes the D,     This is not a Hotel for people that are accustomed to being pampered, You need to head about 5-7 mile south of here, enough said.
We just finished staying here last week.
We chose this hotel becase our activitys were away from here and we could alocate the bulk of our trip funds to activitys verses lodging,   The Hotel is under renovation and I can not comment on the NEW rooms, ours was the old style on the east side, the room was ok, I have stayed at worse that cost more.
The hotel staff was very atentinve to any needs we had, including brinng a frig to our room.
Apparently because of some city health code, they don't have coffie pots available  ( not a problem ) the walgreens across the street to the east has travel ones for about  $17.00.
Filters and coffee are sold here too.
On the isle with Vegas "stuff" you can grab a real coffee cup for a couple bucks.
If your booking included a free breakfast ask at checking for your vouchers.
The breakfast is eggs, bacon, hash browns and toast, cooked very fast and was actually good.
Leave a tip the meal is free okay, enough said.
If you find yourself on the east side of the tower you have a great view of the valley, take your binocular, the helicopter flights come out of the east and they turn right at this hotel flying south towards the strip.
BTW for the SHOPPERS the outlet mall is only a 7 minute drive !!
My Wife picked up a 65.00 pair of jeans for 40.00  Public transportation if needed is right outside the east side of the Hotel.
There is a lot of Police in the area of this Hotel, there is a reason for this!
IF you stand in the covered mall right outside the casino for just a minute.
you will be able to pick out the tourist from the locals very fast and so can the" local"  visitors in the mall area.
Your wallet should be kept in your front pocket.
Check out  the street view of Google maps ( Highly Recommended )  One last thing to help you, the entrance to the parking garage is located on the west side of the Hotel off 3rd street.
3rd dead ends just north of the entrance.
This parking garage is old school, I don't recommend autos/trucks with lift kits.
If in doubt call ahead.
Swing "wide" to enter the structure ( will be on your right side ), you have a very narrow entrance.
BTW the Strip runs NE to SW so there is a slight variable to the headings posted above.
Yes I will stay here again.

They are about to switch over to the new name of The D so I have no idea what to expect.
That being said Fitzgerald's was never known as the Bellagio of Freemont Street.
I do think that you should come to Las Vegas and if this is the only place available come anyway!
Live it up, you are in Las Vegas for cryin' out loud!

I would have given The D 2 stars, but it's in such a perfect location I have to give it 3.
I like crazy Fremont and there's nothing more awesome then stepping out of one of two doorways that lead straight into the madness.
I was there last weekend when the tribute to Rock of Ages was going on, and one of the stages was right next to The D- awesome!
This was my first visit to The D. I purposely stayed in a non-renovated room, and I must say- it was kinda icky for $44 a night.
The rug and chairs are old and dirty- really, they should charge less for these rooms.
And the cleaning was a bit lax.
My remote control had God-knows-what caked on it.
NASTY!
The elevators are so friggin' slow to arrive.
Sometimes a crowd gathers while you're waiting for one of the elevators to show up, only to find the elevator to be too crowded.
They only hold 10 people apiece.
The ride itself is remarkably fast, so I don't understand what takes them so long.
Had I been on a lower floor I would have taken the stairs.
Speaking of floors, apparently the renovated rooms are towards the top, and I hear they are nice.
They certainly looked nice in the photos shown to me at the front desk when I checked in, but I refused to pay $20 extra dollars per night.
I almost regretted that decision when I saw my room, but I reminded myself that I was really there to have the experience of being right on Fremont Street, and I was ok again.
I got a free voucher for the Courtyard Grill, the onsite restaurant.
The voucher was for a free breakfast, which is served all day.
Basic dice-sized squares of potato, two eggs, bland sausage (or bacon) toast.
Meh.
It was ok, dawg.
A little pitchy.
I liked the balcony off the bar on the second floor, even though it's kinda small.
It gave me a new view of Fremont, and put me at eye level of the zipliners, which was amusing.
People seemed to enjoy the Long Bar.
The casino was kind of fun.
I know that some people who see themselves as serious gamblers are annoyed by the dancing girls, but with those girls comes music, which really livens up the place.
It reminded me of a low-rent Planet Hollywood, and I had to appreciate the attempt.
It gave the place a lively, happening feel which you don't get from some of the older Vegas casinos because they cater to a...um... older, more conservative crowd.
Would I stay here again... that is the question.
I don't know.
I guess I'll come back just to try the renovated rooms and decide then.

Overall experience at this property was great.
Not all of the rooms were upgraded but they are making progress and I give it 5 stars for effort.
Nice Long Bar and Go Go Dancers are a plus and I was very surprised to see a younger crowd in the casino so they must be doing something right.
Free breakfast was included and served by very attentive and friendly staff.
Convenient downtown location, free self parking or valet available.
I will definitely stay at this hotel again.

There's just something about The D that I like.
From the minute I walk in off Fremont Street I feel at ease here.
I liked this place when it was Fitzgeralds, I like it even more as The D. From the old school coin slots upstairs to the high energy table games downstairs, this place just makes me feel comfortable enough to come in and stay awhile and I enjoy my time spent here.
I've had nothing but positive experiences from a no hassle changeover of my Fitz card to the new one, and even the staff in the cashiers cage were very helpful and courteous.
Even when my coin slot machine ran out of coins on a payout service was very prompt and delivered with a smile.
In short...it's just a good overall experience here!
A special mention has to be made for the Longbar.
I ended up watching the end of a Nascar Nationwide series race on their wall of flat screens.
The bartenders were quite knowledgeable, the drinks were strong and made correctly, and pricing was comparable to or in some cases slightly less than their competition.
Tack on service with a smile with some hustle thrown in that didn't trip my "I'm impatient and I'm becoming very annoyed" switch and yeah, I like the Longbar.
4 Stars - A very strong 4 stars at that, and 5 stars did cross my mind as I sat here typing this one out.

Spent my 21st birthday here with my boyfriend, first time going to Vegas without family.
Our rates were really cheap, especially compared to hotels on the strip.
Plus, I've always liked the ease of walking between casinos and stores under the Fremont.
Continental breakfast was satisfying, and good quality.
It includes eggs, chopped potatoes, bacon or sausage and toast.
We got a corner room so the view was excellent.
House cleaning ladies always said hi to us as we passed by in the hallways.
Casino is pretty small compared to other places, but only gambled nickel slots so it didn't matter that much to me.
Overall enjoyable experience with no problems.
Tip: If you arrive before check in time at 3pm, talk to the person at the register anyway.
We tried to check in at like 12 and she was able to hold a non smoking room for us to be ready by 3.
(Though we were able to check in at like 2:30)

I don't see the difference from the Fitzgerald.
Actually, one of their openings has a D Las Vegas banner and the other opening still says Fitzgerald's.
The casino floor still looks the same and not really impressive.
I definitely understand that the place is continuing a huge renovation so i will just leave it at that.
Hopefully when I revisit this place, my rating changes for the better.

If you don't mind old smelly, out dated room with poor customer service and very limited parking then this is your place....  Bartenders changing prices on the same drinks from 1 min to the next....  Over all price is cheap for the stay but you do get what you pay for here

For the rate i had to pay ($24/night), this was definitely a good place to stay.
I recommend however... if you have to wake up early, do NOT stay at this hotel... infact, don't stay at ANY hotels on Fremont ST if you're scheduling to wake up early.
The noise is very very loud... the concerts for that week all ended by 2am.
Thankfully we were out till 3am anyways so it didn't apply so much to us.
If you are the type who likes to sleep early, but still want a cheap cheap price, i strongly recommend bringing earplugs.
Jus sayin.
One bad thing.
The restaurant for the complimentary breakfast was eh.... Food was great but service was kinda lame.
"Drink waitress" took a while to notice we were there and had a very bad attitude while the "food waitress" was slow, got my order wrong, and wasn't attentive at all.
I wouldn't blame her though if she was a) new or b) the restaurant was understaffed.... being a waiter i know all too well how that feels.
Soo that brings me to this request: Go the hotel, get some breakfast there, and show the waitresses some love!
Have fun.

Did some gambling here back in May of 2012, although they are at the beginning of the renovation, I can see that it will become a great place to gamble just like their sister property the Golden Gate.
I'm really looking forward to the renovations being done when I comer back in November, as I've booked 5 nights to stay here (for only $193) For less than $40 bucks a night, I don't think you can beat that!!

This review is for the casino only:  I was at the D last night ti see a show - Adam London - who is filling in for Kevin Burke while he's away.
I was pleased to see the Longbar that I've read about online.
There was a vibe and energy to the casino as I walked through.
They have added dancers and I stopped to take in the show.
One of the blackjack dealers was moving pretty nicely, but I think she kept business away from her table.
Who'd want to sit down and stop the entertainment?
While I like the D, I still think it has one of the worst parking garages in downtown Las Vegas.
God, it's awful!

Maybe the people who give this hotel bad reviews aren't the ones staying in their upgraded rooms.
Because I did, and it.was.awesome.
Really, these are really nice rooms.
The bathroom is nice, the room was clean, and the beds are comfy.
You're not spending a ton of time in your hotel room in Vegas anyway, are you??
But I *love* that they had bath and body works products as their complimentary toiletries.
Nice touch!

I really love this hotel.
If you have any complaints about your room, you probably didn't get an upgraded one.. $38 for an upgraded room is such a sweat deal.
You would have to be a total cheapskate not to take advantage of it.
Upgraded rooms are clean, have flatscreen tvs, and comfortable beds.

What used to be the Fitz in Downtown Las Vegas, this place has been going through a new ownership transition and renovations.
I believe it was long overdue.
The D is the new hip place to see and be seen on Freemont Street.
Reasonably priced table games and a variety of slots make this place worth the drive from the strip.
I haven't stayed in the rooms but I imagine they are decent.
I've  received a few comps from them based on minimal play which leads me to believe they are pretty generous when rating players.
Give this place a try and may luck be a lady tonight!

This review is only for the casino & the long bar.
I can't wait until the remodeling at the front of the casino is done, should be good.
The gambling is good and fun, at the long bar they serve you promptly.
I always have a good time in this casino.

This weekend we decided to try a "staycation".
We got a really good deal on the room and we are ready to explore the downtown area.
This time without family.
We checked in and found the room to be clean, spacious and fresh.
They are still working on remodeling but we got one that was completed.
They didn't upgrade the TV, it was the small, box set.
I guess people do not come to Vegas to sit in their room and watch TV.
The casino floor was the same basic lay out as the before when it was the Fitz.
it wasn't very busy and I had no trouble finding a table for blackjack.
There is a big "Longbar" with plenty of flat screens for watching your favorite teams, but most of the time we passed by it remained empty.
I don't know if the place was empty because it was slow weekend, (thus the cheap room rate), or it's how it is normally, when we walked up Fremont street, the other casino's we went in were busy.
Overall, a good place to crash for a weekend downtown.

So let's see what happens w/ this place.
They completely redid the bar, flat screen TV's everywhere, very awesome for sports watching.
However, even though we were gambling at the bar they still charged us $1.95 for a mimosa.
Now, it is still super cheap, but if you want pretty ladies sitting at your bar gambling you better force feed them booze.
It's still well under construction, so it's got a lot of work before it's facelift is complete.
We also thought it was funny that we asked the bartender where a good place to grab lunch was around it and he told us places everywhere BUT there.
Made us very nervous!
Didn't even suggest a place on property!

I hesitate to give The D two stars, but they did refund my deposit, so I guess it is only fair.
We arrived late on Friday (around midnight) after driving in from Orange County.
We found the parking garage and drove up the narrowest entry I have ever seen.
We continued going up and up and up passing dozens of empty spots that were reserved for valet.
"No problem," I said, "I;m sure this structure has a lot more stories.
" We finally got to around floor 10 after making continuous and tiny circles that quickly made us dizzy and noticed that the spots were no longer reserved for valet, they were however either marked for Enterprise rental cars or filled with furniture.
Yes, old furniture was thrown into empty parking spaces and in various spots out into the narrow path.
"Ok, they're remodeling, no big deal.
" I reassured myself.
We continued upward until we got to a dead end.
No spots.
Not one.
A line of cars behind me and nowhere to turn around made me instantly frustrated.
As I managed to get cars behind me to back up just enough for me to make what seemed like a 400 point u-turn, I noticed that not only does the parking garage not have an elevator that goes to the top, but it doesn't even have stairs!
They evidently expect guests to walk down the parking structure in the narrow road.
We drove back down and into the valet area where after some negotiation I was able to get the valet driver to let me keep my car in the front of the hotel while I went inside to talk with the front desk.
The woman at the front desk was friendly but not helpful.
She offered no solutions on where to park other than valet which was not an option for me as I was going to be in and out regularly and the tips and time would add up quickly.
I then decided to cancel our stay but did not receive my first nights deposit back.
(I called a manager later and she did refund my stay after much hesitation and negotiation)  We ended up staying at the Springhill Suites in Las Vegas.
It was less money and absolutely excellent in every imaginable way.
Overall, I am very dissapointed in "The D" as I was very excited to see their new renovated rooms, but after seeing their complete disorganization with their parking and the run down casino that we walked through, it was obvious that they take no pride in their work.
What a shame.

I was a bit worried about staying downtown, but we were pleasantly surprised with The D. Our check in was quick and the staff was curteous and our room was pretty nice.
It was pretty plain but all new and the bed was comfy.
On top of everything we got a free breakfast in the restaurant which was pretty good- two eggs, potatoes and either bacon or sausage and toast.
The service was a little slow, but since it was free who cares.
If I were going back to  Vegas for a quick trip and wanted to stay downtown I would stay at The D again.
It's nothing fancy, but who stays in their room anyway.

This review is for the rooms.
They renamed this place "The D" because it's a "disaster".
Our room sucked.
We found a cockroach where the refrigerator was supposed to be.
On top of that, our refrigerator was missing, and they never brought us one, despite our asking.
When we got into our room, a housekeeping lady barged right in, didn't even knock, just walked right in.
Fortunately we still had our clothes on.
Right outside our window was a large air conditioning system, and it rattled all night long, making it impossible to sleep (room 1641).
We called for someone to fix it, and they determined it was the AC in the room above us rattling against a slab of ice, whatever that means.
They managed to quiet it down a little, but not enough.
We called the manager around midnight, named Dave, to complain about our stay, and he didn't apologize.
We mentioned not getting a refrigerator, and he said, "We're all out", as if it was our problem, not his.
We asked about getting the noisy AC fixed, and he said their technician went  home (at midnight).
It was the fact that the manager was unwilling to make things better for us, that I gave this review only 1 star.
If the hotel had comped us this room, it would have made it all better.
As far as the the "D" hotel goes, the rooms are unchanged from Fitzgerald, except for new paint on the walls, and some new pictures hanging.
We had room 1641, the noise really sucks in here.
The only positive is the nice view, and the spa tub.

We've stayed here several times and hadn't had any bad experiences until this last month we stood there since Friday, 9/14 & left 9/16.
We parked Valet and my daughters Nintendo DSI was stolen.
Now I received a letter stating that once you leave your vehicle the Hotel isn't responsible for anything.
So sorry for my loss!
REALLY?
This is very frustrating...especially when it was a Santa gift for my daughter!
Now she's not understanding why certain people would do this!
I know for sure we will not stay at the D any longer!

Went during bike fest, stayed a week.
When we got there there were no bell men had to lug everything ourselves, the room was nice looking, bed was comfortable but our toilet overflowed and we had water all over the bathroom and door way.. Our air conditioner went out...
The beer!
Idk if it was just the weekend we went but the beer was $8 a glass- small reg size glass!
If we ever stay on Fremont st again probably stay at the nugget, looked really nice.... Maybe in a few years the d will have it together.

The hotel room was nice and clean.
The staff at the front desk was not very friendly as she chastened us for checking in at such a late hour (midnight)....Uhm, we came straight to the hotel from the flight.
We had to wait for 30 mins to check in because their system was down, but she allowed us to check our bags at the counter so we could grab a bite to eat.
I like the place.
They had a McDonald's on site.
Its a great place to people watch.
They had zip lining right outside the hotel.
My boyfriend wanted to zip line, but he didn't get the chance.
Maybe next time.
There was also a Walgreens directly across the street.
A nice hotel.
We will return.

New name, new outside face, a slightly more spacious casino area but all in all it is still just the Fitz, a poor man's excuse for a casino.
And the name the D has to be the stupidest casino name yet.
I know they mean Downtown but there is absolutely no name retention with a letter.
The new modern look is actually pretty ugly, a combination between a glitzy office building and a brothel.
The red and white color scheme lacks cohesion.
What do I like about the Fitz (I mean the D)?
1) Marriage can be Murder is one of the best dinner theater programs I have ever seen.
The food is just ok but the show is a ton of fun.
2) The rewards club gives freeplay without requiring you to put your own money in the machine.
3) they still have several old machines which I prefer to the new 30+ lines and steal a coin to play for big bucks machines.
4) there is still a lot of cheap gaming although that may disappear to pay for the renovation.
The rest is the same.
Smokey, lots of slots, a few table games, mediocre food (although I heard Don B's is good, the rest are not worth trying)  The Fitz (I mean D) continues to feel like a trap for unsuspecting young partiers walking along freemont street.
They seduce you in with a large drink and cheap gaming but when the dust settles, the only people who remain are the old standards who have been coming here for 30 years.
This is best showcased by the pool which is always feels like a Florida retirement community.

Okay I usually like to stay at the suites and Golden Nugget when family comes from Vegas..
It's casual, downtown away from annoying tourists and the nicer hotel in old Vegas.
Well My mom had a few free nights comped so we stayed here the last 2 remaining days.
Wow, since changing from the Fitz, they have really improved on their Rooms!
Their bed is just like the Golden N, suites, but to me I think Much better!
The pillows are fluffy and the down comforter is to die for!
I slept like a baby.
And for the price of the rooms if you have to pay is only $25 bucks!
My friend got a room here for the week to hang downtown with us.
It is still in remodeling, but the gogo girls and supposedly the longest bar in the states (hearsay ofcourse) it's moving in the right direction I have to say.

I actually REALLY love this place and will definitely be back here if not this week, on our trip next year.
This place used to be the old Fitzgerald and they remodeled it to be what it is now.
It looks like an upscale hotel in the middle of old school down town.
We didn't stay in the actual rooms, but gambled and had a fun a time at the bar.
The bartender that was serving us, I believe his name was Randy?
(I will edit if I go back) But he has worked the Bar previous to the remodel for 22 years.
We sat and played the machines and he served us until our hearts content.
He ended up selling me a bottle of Crystal Skull Vodka that was signed by Dan Akroyd for a good price.
We didn't have much luck on the machines (but that's Vegas for you) but we enjoyed the bartenders presence.

Great deal!
Great location!

A few of us changed our plans at the last minute to come in a day early and were looking for someplace cheap to stay on Friday night before we transitioned to our planned stay at Aria on Saturday.
The D rang in at $59/night with no resort fee, although I upgraded to the corner king at $69.
We had previously been into the remodeled casino so we were eager to try out the rooms.
Check in went smoothly with a short line at about 10pm.
We then headed up to our room.
No security at the elevators and non guests could get to the guest rooms, which didn't leave us feeling warm and fuzzy about the security of the property.
This problem was exacerbated by the fact that the escalators to the second floor casino was out of commission.
Getting off the elevator I was greeted by a really old dingy stained carpet and peeling wallpaper, not a good sign.
Fortunately after opening the door to the room, I was relieved.
The room was completely remodeled.
The room had new carpet, new bed and lines and  as spacious complete with a sofa for seating.
A small fridge was present as well.
The corner room had a view towards the mountains out of two sides.
Unfortunately a noisy window A/C unit remained.
Overall I would rate it comparable to the Golden Nugget Rush Tower Rooms.
After dropping off the bags I headed down to meet up with my friends in the casino.
We signed up for Club D, played our free $3 on the slots, and some of us played some table games.
$5 blackjack on the weekend was a welcome sight that would not be found on the the strip.
We didn't end up staying too long because the music was just too loud and the place was filled with smoke.
I am struggling to describe the clientele, the best I can come up with is Tattoo and Fanny pack central.
Due to the out of commission interior escalators we headed out to Freemont and up the exterior escalator.
In the upstairs casino as advertised were all the old coin operated machines.
Seeing the Sigma Derby machine, coin slots, and keno machines that used a light pen was awesome, but I think our group of 30 somethings brought the average age of the clientele up here down a few pegs.
My friend did pull $400 out of a 50cent Wheel of Fortune machine.
Good thing that machine had ticket out.
I was going to die of laughter if it spit out 800 1/2 dollars when he hit the cashout.
We then bugged out of the joint and hit Golden Nugget for the rest of the night.
After returning to the room my friend stopped for a Coney Dog, he said it tasted ok, but was annoyed that he couldn't get a beer to go with it.
He ended up stopping at the Long Bar to wash down the overly sodium filled dog.
I got a great night sleep on the comfy bed and was pleased that a 12pm checkout was standard.
Most of the strip properties have switched to 11am.
All in all the place served its purpose, a cheap above average room on a weekend night, I hope they continue to the renovations of the public spaces including the hallways on the guest room floors.
In addition, I would like to see them turn the music down a notch in the main floor casino and keep some of the riff raff away from the guest room elevators.
Would I stay here again, sure, but only if it remains less expensive then the Golden Nugget.

Stayed here November 15-19 in a nice new updated room.
Bathroom could use a better update, left a little to be desired with the room itself so nice.
Ate at the American Coney Island, really good hot dog.
Did a lot of gambling there, was quite disappointed that playing for 3-4 hours a day at 5-15$ a hand resulted in a whopping offer of a $4 comp.
So therefore I'd stay here again, but will take my gambling elsewhere.

Excellent craps dealers!
Eric, Randal & Julius are so friendly that I kept coming back to play!
The music was way too loud, I had to scream my bets to the dealers!

Yikes!
Except for the bar and the gift shop, nothing seems to have been updated.
Good things may be to come, but they're not there yet.

After awhile all these casinos begin to look like each other, especially off Fremont.
For a moment, I thought that the D Las Vegas was Golden Gate with the dancers outside.
I don't gamble much, but friends and family from out of town tend to gravitate to this place.
So, I assume that the gaming is good.
As for me, this is just another casino with a bar outside, lovely dancers, and your occasional winnings.
Still a small casino that looks to have been updated in the last year.
However, they forgot to update the carpeting.
Drink prices are always good, even better when they're free (comped).

The renovated rooms are actually very nice.
Flat screen TV's.
24-hour Walgreens right next door.
Lots of restaurants nearby.
The only problem is the loud music from Fremont Street that goes late into the night.
Ask for the quietest room possible.
The parking is free but the garage is old, and self parking does not start until the 7th level.
Thank you D for not charging a resort fee.
I will definitely stay here again.
I am an avid bicyclist and brought 2 bikes.
The security manager prevented me from taking my bikes to my room because they do not allow bikes in their new elevators.
He was cool though.
He let me store the bikes in luggage room behind the bell desk.

Gamble here, had great time playing three card poker.
The D Grill has great food, had white mushroom and ham soup .
As for my main course had brisket,.
Nothing can beat hot food in Vegas specially during the winter  Didn't stay in the rooms so can comment on the rooms.
Dancing dealers couple of girls can dance.
Great overall gambling environment.

I stopped into the D in December, with my brother, while doing our morning walk through The Fremont Street Experience.
We saw the sexy girls dancing on the bar outside and decided to take a look inside the renovated, former Fitzgeralds, now named after the new owner, Derek Stevens.
Never having visited this casino before, it looked clean by downtown standards.
The "long" bar was pretty cool, with video poker machines that paid and plenty of flat screen tv's.
We grabbed a quick chili dog and fries at the new American Coney Island hot dog restaurant (think Nathan's only better).
The renovations in the casino are about 2/3rds complete.
They have 2 craps tables and 2 roulette tables.
Minimum bets were $5 on this particular morning, and the dealers all seemed amicable.
I would definitely stop again by for a quick drink.

Who would have thought this place would be pretty cool?
I'll admit, I judged too quickly and thought the D would be a bit blah.
Most of the reactions I got when talking about this place was "where's the D?
" or "I never heard of that place".
I hosted my BFF's bachelorette party in their suite on the top (34th) floor.
Because of the CES convention, suite prices in town were running $500 and up, which I was unable to afford.
I scored the suite for about $180 and the staff honored my request of getting the suite on the 34th floor if available.
The modern suite itself blew me away.
There is a wet bar and a huge living area with a wrap-around couch.
A small dining table with 4 chairs and 3 bar stools are present as well, perfect for hosting a small group.
There's a small refrigerator and a wine cooler built into the counter.
The bedroom is separated from the living/bar space.
Roomy bedroom with a comfy bed.
The bathroom has a huge shower with two shower heads.
Different lighting in the bathroom is also available, which is useful for girls that need to primp themselves beautiful.
The only complaint I have about the room is that there is no separate bathroom in the living space.
So my guests had to go to the bedroom to use the bathroom in there.
There's a coney island hot dog place and a McDonalds right downstairs.
These two places became super handy when all of us had a little too tipsy.
I wasn't too fond of how small the casino was.
I felt that the reason why it was so smoky and smelled like burnt ashtray was because of the size of the casino.
The parking garage is also tiny and a pain to drive through.
General parking starts on the 7th floor.
Anything below that is reserved for valet.
But can't blame the D for how small the place is - I mean the building itself was built 30+ years ago.
Downtown Las Vegas is slowly but surely revamping itself and is definitely cool again.
The D Hotel just adds to the new and improved of the downtown area.

We went with a group of 6 and stayed for hours.
Dealers were fun and service came often.

The remodel did wonders for this place.
I had been a few times prior, but never impressed.
I have since stayed there twice and stopped by when downtown bar hopping.
The rooms are nice, clean and affordable.
Parking still is a little annoying, but nothing bad.
The long bar outside on Fremont is staffed with friendly and hardworking staff.
Every drink I've ordered there has been more than generous and service has always been with a smile.
If I plan on staying downtown and don't want to spend way to much for a room, the D is my choice.

This hotel was absolutely terrible.
There was no hot water after 11 am and the sink took 30 mins or more to drain (gross).
It was supposed to have been renovated but it's obvious they just painted the walls and put in new furniture.
The bathrooms had not been updated and still had funky old fixtures.
When you used the shower the pipes in the wall would staring making a knocking sound.
The A/C and heat was always either too cold or hot but never right.
The food at the D grill was awful.
The tiny Vue bar had extremely weak drinks.
The outside of the hotel is very sleek and modern but the inside is a different story.
They should have spent more time updating the inside.
The only thing worthwhile at this hotel was the Sigma Horse Race game on the second floor (it was super fun to play with a group of people) and the Marriage Can Be Murder dinner show.
We also witnessed a staff member try to cheat a couple out of quarters at the horse race game.
She refused to return their quarters until a few of us spoke up.
And then we got scammed by one of the valet guys over taxi service when we were checking out and trying to get to the airport.
We asked if he would call us a cab because we didn't know where the taxi stand was.
He said there weren't any cabs available but he could get us a limo for $35.
We agreed b/c we just needed to get to the airport.
Then he siad it was going to be a 10 minute wait for the limo and we had to keep saying we just need a cab.
Next he said the limo would be $45 and we said no just get us a cab.
Then a limo pulls up and the valet guy puts our luggage in it and says again it's $45.
At this point we have become very, very angry and so no we want a cab.
The limo driver says he'd take us to the airport for $40 and we agreed just to get out of there.
We find out after we get in the limo that the driver didn't know anything about this exchange between us and the valet and that there were three cabs parked right next to the limo just around the corner!!
The valet scammed us for a measly $10 kick back by forcing us to take a limo.
We suggested to the limo driver not to give the valet the kick back because of the terrible way he treated us.
Needless to say we will never stay at this hotel again and we will never recommend this place to our friends.

My Aunt, Uncle, Mother in law, and 17 year old cousin came to stay the week.
they rented 2 rooms.
While returning with our other 20 yr old cousin they got stopped entering the hotel.
The security guard watched her put her key in the security drop box(cuz they were only keeping the 1 room til they left at mid night for the air port).
They were told they could not enter cuz they were under 21 or had to show a key.. we went down and got them and escorted them up to the room.
we then left to do some shopping when returning they (my under age cousins) were walking 10 inches(yes that is correct inches) behind us and security stepped in between us and stopped them a second time.
Sid they could not enter the hotel cuz they were under 21. they wouldnt even let them yell for us even though we were there.
Needless to say we will not be returning or suggesting the D to any other family when they come to town.
Some one must have for got to educate the security that if you have a hotel attached to the casino under aged people are allowed on the premisis!

First of let me say this about the D if you have NOT stayed there..... A .
Try it!
Don't bother writing a flaming review no one will believe you.
With that said the Ol' Fitz has gone under some dramatic changes in the past couple of years and there were some growing pains turning it into the new  "D" Although I have stayed at the Fitz on multiple trips I have only stayed at the D twice and am booked there again this coming week.
I can't wait to eat a pound of chili in various forms at All American and yes I have eaten at their joint in Detroit ..mmm good.
The new steakhouse coming sounds awesome.
The old courtyard cafe is now the grill and I can tell you the food and beverage guys will on top of it.
Trust me on this one.
The best parts of the renovations and transition from Fitz to D other than the obvious remodels are they have kept the room prices reasonable, kept the best of the best staff, still have great slots.
cheeeep BJ and other tables and I can't wait to use the comps and "freebies" as a member of their players club.
Late night plus is Mickey D's for a quick bite as it is 24 /7 I will update after my stay on the best and the worst but will wager 9/5 there won't be much negative.
OBTW both my wife and I did grow up in and around Detroit..and are quite glad that the D has a Detrot flair in Vegas.

Totally renovated and chicks almost naked, can't go wrong with that.

Apparently the D is for disappointment.
The td;dr version: room had broken shower, management lied about room switching, but ended up switching it after in person exchange.
Tempted to give this a 1-star but an arduous room switch process bumped it up to a 2.
Here is what happened: we reserved a room at the D because a friend of mine was having her 30th birthday celebration on Fremont street & she picked the D as the suggestion for hotel.
Check in process was pretty smooth.
The room looked clean albeit a bit noisy as it faces the Fremont street (no problem with that - can sleep with ambient noises).
However, in the next morning, we realized the shower doesn't have a handle to channel the water from tub to overhead.
Called front desk and they said they'd send over an engineer.
45 minutes go by - nobody shows up.
By now we need to get going so we meet up with the group for brunch.
I called again and a different person picks up, promised would send engineering over.
I said we're strapped on time, and asked a room switch was possible.
The answer was no; the only available ones for switching were smoking rooms.
Nope, not acceptable.
I said if I could get the keys to one of the smoking rooms so we can just use the shower.
After back and forth with the receptionist, she said to come down and talk with her manager.
So I did ... and after explaining the situation and asking about getting keys to a smoking room temporarily, all of a sudden a non-smoking room was available after all.
Ha ha, what?
One: don't assign rooms with non-functioning shower to your guests.
Two: don't lie to them about room availability.

This review is for the casino only.
There are a lotta slots to choose from, and they're pretty loose.
They have a Hold 'em Fold 'em table, which can be hard to find.
The table chips are fancy and new.
My hubby and I played Hold 'em Fold 'em with Harry dealing for hours and he was The Bomb!
Totally funny and personable, yet extremely polite and respectful.
It doesn't hurt that he dealt me a straight flush, haha.
They have really tried to create an adult atmosphere - love the way the dealers look with the arm garters.
The "Dancing Dealers", a.k.a.
booty-shaking chicks are kinda lame - they're a deterrent for some and a plus for others.
They're covered in tramp stamps and their moves are awkward.
The cocktail waitresses came around more often than any other casino which was much appreciated!
The crowd is a lot of 30+ year-olds getting decked out in full club attire to drink and play penny slots, which for me is a turn-off.
And the music is blasted ridiculously loud.
But overall the place is clean and new while still taking you into a whole different world.
I would play here any day.

Entertainment review:  GREAT time last weekend on Fremont Street ... spent "Laughternoon" enjoying the FUNNY Adam London, Magic/Comedy show @ the D ... many laughs for the whole Family.
Also went to  "Marriage can be Murder" @ the D ... GREAT Dinner/Comedy Show ... alot of Bang for your Buck !

As a local and former Detroiter, I was excited to get a little taste of "home".
Valet is only open to hotel guests and the parking garage is a joke.
The first 7 floors are reserved for valet?!?!?
Then you drive up and up and up only to have the garage just end with no logical way out.
Went there specifically to eat at American Coney Island.
It was OK, but they are kind of chinzy on the chili for their coneys.
Some Vernors would have sealed this as a Detroit coney island.
Walked around the casino, but thought the dancing table girls were tacky and the music was ridiculously loud.
Nice try, poor execution

The renovations done to the D (formerly Fitzgerald's) have really improved this old school Vegas property.
The newly designed bar is pretty high tech, lots of TVs and seats.
The bartenders do a little flair bartending and are pretty friendly.
I love this place!

Its nice going anywhere there is a Detroit them.
Was worth a stop in and the zip line runs right by it.
Also vary fun.
Only place i have ever put real change into a slot.
Empty them change bins lol.

I spent  2 nights in a room on the 25th floor with a view to Fremont St.
I must say that the room & accommodations were adequate, have a certain degree of comfort & space for the price.
My reason for the low rating is that the room was not sound proofed at all.
I was able to  clearly hear everything going on at the hall way, adjoining rooms and wort of all, Fremont St. which now gets pretty rowdy at night.
The combination of early birds and night owls make it almost impossible to sleep at this hotel.

Stayed there last week for three nights while in town for a trade show.
The remodeled room was very comfortable and relatively quiet, even with the "Fremont Street Experience" right next to the hotel.
Free valet parking for hotel guests.
No rating for the casino as I didn't gamble at all.
The D grill restaurant was good for a $10-$15 breakfast as I'm not into buffets.
The American Coney Island restaurant right outside the hotel on Fremont was a little slice of home as I live in the Detroit area where there are multiple coney island restaurants in every town.
Actually, their chili dogs were excellent.
I liked this part of Las Vegas with its old school feel and there's a lot of dining and drinking options in the neighborhood that are both good and relatively inexpensive.
My 3 night stay at the D was about the same cost as one night in a South strip hotel.
It was a great value and at good place to stay; the staff was extremely helpful and friendly.

My husband and I went just for a weekend get-away and we went to the Cubs spring training baseball games.
First, location was ideal!
Second, great value!
Third, we were in a corner king room and it was amazingly quiet, especially for St, Patty's Day weekend.
Third, the bed was very comfy and the staff was great!
The only suggestions I have is that they put in bigger flat-screen TV's and replace the counter in the bathroom.
The bathrooms are nice and big but the counter was a little beat up.
Other than that, we had no complaints and will definitely stay here again!

It's official.
The D has secured the title of "second-best-place-on-Fremont-St."  The Golden Nugget is still firmly holding on to first place.
But considering where they came from (the old, dirty, and just plain awful Fitzgeralds), that's a hell of an improvement.
This is our second time at the D.  We stayed here while it was undergoing its transition last year.
It was experiencing some growing pains at the time, but it appears to have worked them out at this point.
And they've done a damn fine job.
There is no trace of the old Fitzgeralds (except for the parking garage, which is the only reminder of that shithole).
The rooms are updated, comfortable, and reasonably priced.
The casino is fun, upbeat, and entertaining (referring to the dancing girls, obviously).
The Longbar is a great place to watch a game and have a few drinks.
Marriage can be Murder is worth the price of admission.
I haven't tried the new steakhouse, but we'll probably get to it sometime this week.
If it had a poker room, I'd have no reason to go anywhere else.
Too bad.
My wife and I get to Vegas about 5-6 weeks a year, and spend at least one of those trips on Fremont.
I'm really impressed with the quality and feel of the D, and will certainly be back again.
4 stars.
Would be 5 except for:  the parking garage, no free internet, no fridge or microwave in the rooms, and well, let's be honest, it's not anywhere near as nice as Aria or Venetian.

Definitely a good place to stay.
Not quite as good as the Golden Nugget, but not nearly as expensive.
I got a room here for $40/night during the week and it far exceeded my expectations.

Would give them atleast two stars but they don't deserve it  Hotel room was ok walking into it but the longer you stay you realize you get what you pay for Got this deal during spring break for $250/2 nights & now I see why  Our view from the room sucked, why would you make a 'corner king suite' room posted behind the construction of the light show Was promised a view of Fremont st it was a view alright if you could squeeze your head out of ONE of the six windows to see a little tiny spot of Fremont I do not want to see how the light show is set up from my room with all the wiring and metal everywhere.. REALLY  Second disaster was leaving the room for the entire day & coming back to find out the room was not cleaned by housekeeping Saw the housekeepers in the room next door when I left out but they were too busy gossiping and talking loud to remember to clean my room even when they were next door?
Called the front desk & they offered me sheets?
Um no how about you come clean the room with new towels sheets amenities  Elevator took literally 10 min with a 10 person capacity I even saw it almost close on a ladies head they didn't get in fast enough like literally almost chop her head off, shouldn't it be sensors that stop when someone is coming in or out.. Just another old perk of this hotel  Oh yea walls/floors in our bathroom was gross & the toilet and sink made some loud loud noises after you use it or after the people next  door used they're own I don't want to know when my neighbors are using the water and toilet  Same old dump with a coat of paint on it The go go dancers were terrible other than the d grill the rest of the staff workin throughout the hotel sucks with bad attitudes  The girl that checks you in named Erika is a bitch Got $30 credit for all the complaints I had which is pretty much a slap in the face  This place sucks ' everyone who works here including inside McDonalds needs a brain transplant

$0.25 CENT HORSE RACING!
We'd been walking along Fremont and saw a landing above the crowd, with an escalator going up to it.
AFter taking a few pictures and talking to a guy whol told us "he was tripping balls" we turned to go back to ground level, but realized it was a one-way escalator.
Instead of running against the moving stairs, we entered the D Casino.
We walked around and found their theater and looked at the machines to gamble on.
That was when we saw it!
HORSE RACING!!!
I don't know why we didn't stay and play that day.
We wanted to keep moving along Fremont.
But we came back a couple of days later and played several games.
Drink service was attentive and I even won on a couple races.
D Casino also has a bar on the Fremont street with go-go dancers (though, they were doing a pretty half-a$$ job when we saw them!
) Made me want to climb up on the bar and show them how its done!

**Casino Review Only**   I've never actually stayed here, but several of my friends have... Before they pimped it out, it was known as The Fitz... Good ol' smelly Fitz... like seriously.
I always stay at The Fremont, and on my recent trip (November 2012) decided to check out the newly remodeled hotel now known as The D...
I NEVER wanted to leave!
Screw going to a club, you can just hang out here all night!
So, I find a machine, sit down and all the sudden crazy dance music is blaring!
I was sitting really close to the tables, and wouldn't ya know, right next to every table is go-go dancer galore!
Not only do you get to listen to all the latest pop music, you can now check out hot chicks dancing too (if you're in to that sort of thing)!
I actually stayed and hung out for over 2 hours, not something I normally do, but then again, I was winning, sooo...
But in all seriousness, I think they did a great job with the remodel, but it's clearly targeting the younger crowd, so if you don't like loud music, this place is NOT for you!

Great rooms and the most comfy beds ever.
Definitely stay here.

This revew is for the casino/bar:  I've never had such fast drink service while gambling before.
Because I'm not a high-roller.
Heck, I'm hardly even a gambler, period.
The D doesn't care who you are.
You get served well when you're gambling your pennies and nickles away.
And for that, I will be forever loyal.

If you haven't recently been to Fremont street in Downtown Vegas then you don't know what you've been missing.
There are so many freshly remodeled hotels, and new bars etc .
This place for instance, I actually don't even remember what hotel this used to be.
All I know is that I'm diggin it now.
The exterior entrance looks great,........ Humongous red neon "D", ....very eye catching.
Then you walk in and you forget that you're actually on Fremont anymore.
It's totally nice inside,.....very modern.
The layout is great and it's definitely got that "cool" factor going for it.
I haven't actually stayed in this hotel as of yet, but I'm definitely planning on it for the next time I visit..........Then I will have to update and add that to my review.

Saw ADAM LONDON in Laughternoon at The D. This is a fabulous show for all ages.
Mr. London has an engaging personality and there is a laugh a minute.
My husband and I went to see the show, as he is a magic buff, and we loved  Adam's fresh and endearing style.
He is without a doubt a very talented comedy magician and performs some first class magic.
Although not a kid's show, the children in the show loved him, as did the adults.
Highly recommend.

Came downtown on St Patty's Day for a small magic show in the D.  The magic show was a little cheesy, but it was fun.
In a small theatre upstairs.
Upstairs is where you'll find the old-school COIN slots that actually pay out in COINS!
But beware, they will fly out all over the place if you don't cover the COIN exit area...  Downstairs was where the tables and newer slots are.
Roulette was good to me and got a free "I got lucky at the D" t-shirt!
Pretty fun place, love the feel of the old downtown casinos!

My wife and I stayed at The D during the 2013 Academy of Country Music Awards weekend.
First, let me tell you a little about ourselves.
We named one of our boys "Daniel Ocean", as in the movie "Ocean's 11" with the Rat Pack.
We dig Vegas, as you can already tell, but not the pretentious tourist-trap that you find nowadays on the Strip.
I'm talking about the cool-as-ice, no-nonsense, hip but not cheesy Vegas from the 1960's.
Being born in the 1970s made me miss this era.
Lucky for me, The D simply gets this concept and knocks it out of the park.
Its small space allows a more intimate feel where the dealers and the cocktail girls know your name within the hour and remember you all weekend.
Yeah, that's the way Vegas should be.
Our room was a standard 2 queen beds.
Simple decor, but not plain.
Definitely on the hip side.
The beds were super comfortable.
Slept like a baby all weekend.
Room was clean, and the maid service was prompt.
I'm a no-nonsense guy, and that's all I ask for.
Therefore, the D hotel rooms are aces in my book.
Anyways, as I was saying earlier, we were there for the ACM weekend.
If you haven't been to Vegas during this weekend, you're missing out, even if you don't like country music.
Free music from country's biggest stars right on the Fremont Street Experience.
We bought tons of alcohol from the local gift shops at reasonable prices and left it in our room to chill in ice.
You probably won't believe me, but our room at The D was a 5 minute ROUND TRIP to the Fremont Street Main Stage right outside the D's main entrance.
I was able to leave my group, go to my room and refill on beers, rejoin my party, and only miss out on 1 song.
Incredible, right?
I've stayed at the MGM before, and in that monstrosity of a hotel/casino it's taken me 15 minutes (fifteen!!!
) to travel from my room to reach the Strip... one way!!!
Second floor casino is awesome as well.
All the slot machines on the 2nd floor pay out in coins, so the old-school "cling-cling-cling" of coins landing on the slot machine trays are back!
First floor is the main casino, and the main attraction are the "Dancing Dealers".
Not only are they pleasant to the eyes, but they're awesome dealers as well.
Usually Blackjack is bland, but the dealers get into it and really ramp up the excitement.
I felt as if I was playing Craps given all the excitement that was going on at the Blackjack table.
Is this the most luxurious casino in Vegas?
No, not by a long shot.
However, The D deserves the 5 stars I gave it for the biggest bang-for-your-buck you can hope for.
I spent $177 (+ hotel taxes and NO resort fees) for 3 nights on a prime weekend (ACM Awards), and I had the best time ever.
I will definitely stay here again for the next ACM Awards weekend.

This is my 2nd visit to this casino/hotel; first time staying at the hotel for three nights-  Casino-two floors, first floor has the long bar with row-to-row HDTVs, table games, slots, etc.
Right now, its my favorite casino on Fremont Street, great atmosphere, good service, go-go girls in the evening dancing in the table area.
Escalators to the 2nd floor casino, more intimate, separate bar with friendly bartenders, good service.
2nd floor cafe-excellent food, I had one of the breakfast platters, good prices.
1st floor there is a McDonalds, prices were better than expected.
They do have a dollar menu but you have to wait for the electronic display menu to cycle to see it.
Fast service but my food was not hot.
Hotel-I would rate the hotel 2 stars, my main complaint, rooms have in-wall air conditioners like a motel that appear to be leftover from the old hotel.
Very noisy and in our room made very loud banging noises when it cycled from fan to A/C automatically every few minutes as the room cooled.
It was so loud even on "low", I had to go down to one of the shops on Fremont to buy ear plugs (best 89 cents I ever spent!
)  Very small HDTV in the room, no electric outlets on any wall, no place to plug-in the iron.
The bed linens and carpet appear brand new, room was very clean; fresh coat of paint on the walls.
There's a coffeemaker in the room but $2.50/cup for the K-cup coffee!
Towels in the bathroom were clean but were either very old or cheap.
Will definitely go back to the "D" casino and restaurant but will probably stay at a hotel with central air conditioning or the newer, quieter air conditioners.
In general, Fremont Street is getting to be a better experience and better value than the Strip.

For the price it was great.
Bed was clean and super comfy.
Location on Fremont St.
The strip was loud enough to be an annoyance if we had wanted to go to bed before 10pm.
Casino floor was typical smokey.
Room had issues.
Sink clogged with debris from prior guest.
Shower water was warm at best.
Little stuff: Elevator lobby didn't have directional signs for rooms.
Recent remodel evident on the room floor, though carpet seams were frayed, wallpaper edge not  glued down, ripples in the carpet.
Operator could not correctly route my call to the valet desk.

I will say I wanted to check this place out specifically because I am from the Detroit area.
Therefore, this could be a little biased.
Gambling: Top floor is "Vintage Vegas" with coin operated slots and other old games.
This was my favorite part of The D. The lower level has normal slots you would see in other casinos.
The table games were lower priced compared to the strip.
I assume this varies by time and day, but tables started at $5 which was a nice change from the $15+ I saw on the strip.
Food: We ate at the D Grill.
It was decent food.
I dont think there was anything too special, but did notice some local Detroit call outs in the menu.
I saw they were opening an Andiamo's restaurant which are nicer places scattered throughout the suburban Detroit area.
If the food and management is the same in The D as it is in Michigan, this should be a success.
American Coney is a staple in downtown Detroit.
Growing up in the Detroit area, I never though of Coney Islands as anything unique.
However, knowing these are not all over the country, this should do pretty well for quick and dirty food.

Being from Detroit and hearing the owners are also fellow Michiganders, I felt like it was only fitting to visit this place after it changed from Fitz's.
At first (a month or so) after closing I wasn't impresses, it looked like they just changed the sign and that was it.
Since then they have added American Coney Island, Andiamo Italian Steakhouse and renovated other areas of the building.
The new carpet does show some wear, but I do feel like they make the place feel like Motown.
it's funny all my friends back in Michigan as about The D more than anything else because they market heavily in metro Detroit.
As downtown revs back, I find myself spending more and more time at The D!

This is the second place we stayed when we decided to stay an extra day cant beat $31.00!!
We got the Premium Corner King room 2142.
Great room even better BED!!
The view was so nice and they had a Kuerig coffee machine with Fiji water.
I haven't seen that before.
The bathroom was ok but they had Bath & Body Works tollietries so that was cool.
I really liked the Vintage Casino part of the Hotel but didn't really win anything.
Not sure what other reviews are talking about but we had a great stay and great sleep.
I will be coming here again!

My family has been coming to Fremont street for ages, so when I heard the Fitz was gone and replaced with The D, I was intrigued.
We stayed just one Tuesday night due to a family emergency.
I had been sleeping in a hospital waiting room for a couple nights, so just the sight of a clean bed was enough to bring me to tears.
Still- I was really impressed with the room over all.
I loved the clean lines & bright bold red.
It was classy and fresh... not something you find on Fremont often.
The casino was nice, if a little cramped.
Lots of fun slots, which I enjoy.
It is a little difficult to navigate and the "front" desk appears to be in the BACK of the building.
Perhaps if you valeted... but the parking signs were weird and it was difficult to figure out where exactly to go outside.
The "Vintage Vegas" area is cute and a nice nod to the history of downtown.
It was easy to find the restaurants up there as well.
Overall, I think it's a great deal and I will most likely be returning.
Given the choice between 4 Queens, Fremont & The D, I'd have to say The D will be my go-to from now on.
The Pluses: + Great price ($31 midweek) + Clean rooms + Nice size desk + Decent views + Good restaurants + Tons of slots + Lots of easily accessible electrical outlets + Noon check out time standard  The Minuses: - Casino floor is crowded - Driving up parking lot levels is like playing chicken with oncoming traffic - Coffee & Water in room is totally overpriced - Alarm Clock time was off - $9.99 wifi for 24 hours

The newly renovated hotel was a great deal (~$35 a night) and we were right outside all the action on Fremont St.
I thought it was really cool that there were literally concerts outside the hotel from 12pm to 2am every day during our stay, but I could see how people that wanted to go to sleep earlier than 2 in the morning could find it annoying.
I would recommend ear plugs to those people or request to get a room on the quiet side of the hotel (if there is one).
This was my first stay on Fremont and it was like a totally different trip than the times when I have stayed on the strip.
For one, it is nice that everything is laid back and you don't really have to dress to impress.
Also I liked that there are so many places to eat, drink and party for really cheap.
It was a nice change.
I will add though that 2 of the 4 elevators in the hotel were broken for at least one day.
This was a major problem and our party nearly got in a fist fight with 2 crazy broads that pushed my friend and verbally assaulted her in attempt to cut into the elevator in front of the people that had been waiting for over 20 minutes.
I called down to guest services who knew about the broken elevators and requested that a security guard be placed in the hall until they had 4 working elevators - but really I am surprised that they had not done this already, even if it was just to alert people of how to get to the stairs or that they would have an excessive wait.

The Blind Ambitious Tour of Thelma & Louise made its stop at The D.  Love the valet service and the whole feel.
It was as though we arrived at the Ritz!!
We really appreciate Debra for her impeccable housekeeping svc and for killing the cricket that made its way into our room.
Thank u also to Homer for his transportation referrals.
The only issue: the$100 hold on the cc despite having paid a full night as part of the booking.
Also as you shower the water does not drain as fast.
Would stay again.
Thank you Thelma & Louise

I don't know why I spent even a couple hours in this revamped casino hotel because I wasn't impressed from the start.
The dealers at the blackjack tables are dolled up ladies who circulate between dealing cards and go go dancing.
All fine and dandy if they weren't so rude!
I also expected a lower table limit considering we were downtown and not on the strip.
Yes, it was a Saturday night but $10 minimums at all tables?!?
You can actually find casinos that are similar to this little hole for $3 minimums on the strip (you have to look hard, but they're there!).
Maybe the rooms were nice but I didn't stay there.

Has nothing to do with Detroit.
Don't waste your time.
Did I not like this place

My only regret staying at the D was not coming staying here longer!
Checked in on Friday and things went smoothly, even for it being a holiday weekend.
It's a bit of a smaller hotel, but it was recently renovated so the rooms, carpets, etc seemed fresh and new.
I was surprised at how nice our room was for the price!
It was my first time at Fremont, so the location was awesome.
Loved the D Bar and the waitresses there were really friendly and helpful (she suggested a mixture of the Chi Chi flavor and Hurricane..so yummy!).
The pool was a bit small, but the people there were really friendly and down to earth..no need to feel like you have to impress anyone or wear a thong bikini to fit in!
Getting an elevator during check out time was hard, and we had to wait about 20 minutes, so beware of the elevators from like 11am-1pm!
Every staff person (from housekeeping to McDonald's to valet) was friendly and the customer service was excellent.
After dropping some serious dough on a disastrous stay at another hotel the following nights, I kept thinking that I should have just stayed at the D...loved it and WILL be back!
Thanks for a great stay :)

Perfect value in downtown Vegas.
Rooms were clean but simple, like a Holiday Inn, except the beds were freakin' awesome!!
I don't think I've stayed in a comfortable-er hotel bed.
Self-parking was a mess.
It took five minutes for the check-in lady to explain to me how hotel guests park for free.
(They can, in theory, as it turns out.
)  But on both Friday and Saturday nights the self-park was completely 100% full, forcing me to either valet-park (no) or visit my friends down the street (hello El Cortez!).
The casino floor is a bit silly.
Ridiculously loud music, and an attempt to convince you that a party is happening 24/7 even when it's clearly not.
The blackjack dealers are, at night, scantily-clad women who must occasionally take a turn on the small dance floors between blackjack tables.
A few of them were highly distracting, I'll admit, but the scene, overall, was not what I was looking for.
One of the best recent additions to downtown Vegas is the 24/7 hot dog place at the D.  It's called something like America's Coney Dog.
It's really a tremendous value late at night.
$10 or so for a chili dog, chili fries, and Coke.
Extra for chili in the Coke.
Not health food, but super-quick and better than any other super-late-night food option I'm aware of.

Pros: -NO RESORT FEES -Parking is validated and free if you stay here, otherwise it's $1 an hour.
-Prime location for the Fremont Street Experience -Very easy access to room from Casino (unlike a lot of the bigger hotels where it takes 10 minutes just to get from your room to the outside of the hotel) -Clean and nicely remodeled -I think nearly every room has a decent view since it was built vertically not horizontally -Comfy beds and really nice furniture   Cons: -Parking is a pain, you have to drive up 7 levels just to park and the structure is narrow.
-WIFI is not free, but I suppose that is better than paying a resort fee and why do you need internet in Vegas right?

I'm told this used to be the Fitzgerald, and I don't think I ever went when it was that hotel.
I dragged my husband to the D because I heard they had the Sigma Derby game upstairs.
I used to play that back when I first started to come to Vegas in the 90s but then all the machines disappeared.
We went on a weekend night, and tried to valet the car.
It looks like you can or should only be able to valet if you are a hotel guest, which I think is pretty lame.
They have a small space.
The valet staff was pretty young.
My husband had a foot injury and so we had rented a power scooter to get him around and usually needed help getting it in and out of the car, and assembled, so we always used valet, and might I say, at most properties, we were welcomed.
This place seemed a little snootier.
But they accepted our car, grudgingly.
Of course the valet staff didn't offer to help us in any way.
We got into the casino and I knew the Derby was upstairs so we proceeded to look around for the elevators.
The place is really more for younger folks, I think.
We're 51 and 62.
The recorded music was BLASTING at club levels, and there was a long bar of hipsters looking around to see what kind of fresh meat was coming into the area.
The pit area has got go-go dancers in scantily clad outfits, dancing, while people play table games.
Maybe the men find this appealing, I wouldn't.
We did finally ask someone where the elevators were after getting some unhelpful looks from everyone there, and found the Derby.
There was a loud group of 30-something men playing it....not like I recall in the old days.....and all the seats were full.
As the music and the noise level of people talking was pretty high, and the place is pretty small and close, we decided to leave and go get our car.
We ran into several drunk people on the way out.
It took them longer to find our car than other people that came up to valet after us, and after I tipped the valet guy, he just walked away and didn't offer to help in any way, or even close my door.
So, note to self, be younger, and don't God forbid be disabled, and count on drinking, if you want to fit it.
Oh, and probably having a headache wouldn't be a good thing either.

The D is one my wife's and I favorite spots.
We love to hang out at the outside bar with the two best flair bartenders in town (Christian and Martin) and watch the interesting people who wander Fremont Street Experience.
Its like getting two shows for the price of one!
It's definitely a great spot to unwind after a long work week.

Didn't stay at the hotel, but can only comment as to the crowd after a recent walk-through.
Recently updated, but more old slots than new, mirrored only by the age of the crowd.
Fairly good amount of less-than-desirable hotel guests as well, walking around eyeing everyone and everything.
I can't remember the last time I saw that many Cholos sporting LA Dodgers attire, shaved heads, and black Speedo sunglasses.
Around $40 a night on the weekdays, but money isn't everything, especially if you're constantly checking your back pocket to make sure your wallet is in tact.
Maybe the rooms are nice, but I'll probably never find out.
Guess I'm an LV Strip kinda guy.

Staying here is like going to New York and stayed the night in a decent hotel... in Harlem!
Even with its cheap price tag and no resort fee($40), it is still not enough to convince me to stay here again.
The room is actually decent, yet it is the less than desirable clientele that REALLY scared me off.
Walk around this hotel inside and out, then go down to the real strip (8 miles away), it is obvious that this isn't the Vegas experience, for business or for pleasure, one would want.
I'd avoid this place in the future if I can.
I was constantly worrying about the safety of my car and my wallet.
All 6 staff members I have dealt with were simply unpleasant, they all lack that sincerity that deem necessary in the service industry.
I've got staff knocking on my door at 8AM "just to check and see if we have left yet.
" We all know what you are trying to pull here, you aint fooling no one.

The management consist of six-fingered, albino banjo players.
This place is a shit-hole... over crowed and understaffed.

Even during the remodeling it's a wonder how the old Fitz has changed, for the better.
The Name isn't familiar to most but the owner has really put his money where his mouth is, and turned this dive around.
You still get what every hotel in downtown gets, a lot of foot traffic that some Strip hotels never see.
The Downstairs casino has high energy music playing and it can be quite loud, but upstairs is the Old fashioned coin machines are.
Has one of the Best Steakhouses in Las Vegas.
The D' grill has everything a dinner needs on its menu, and i have never had a bad meal there.
It's a work in progress, but already it looks like its going to be a great Place to stay,play,and party in Las Vegas

This is a really tough review for me to write.
It's tough because I love Derek Stevens (the owner of both this and the Golden Gate) and everything he stands for.
And I was a big fan of Fitzgeralds (this hotel & casino before it became the D).
In fact, the Fitz was my introduction to downtown when I first gave it a try back in 2006.
Back then the Fitz had an Irish theme, which they gradually phased out until it was all but completely abandoned by the time Mr. Stevens & Crew took over.
In sum, I love what they've done to the place.
It's a major step up.
But there are some things about it that, well, maybe only time can fix.
I know it couldn't have been easy to redo a complete dive like the Fitz had become.
Okay so in the spirit of "completely honest reviews," I'll shoot it to you straight.
As always.
Here are the pros and cons as I saw them following my recent three-night stay:   Pros:   1.
Completely upgraded casino and check-in area.
Very comfortable and modern.
The Long Bar.
Unique and, well, long.
Great place for watching your favorite sporting events.
And the man Derek himself can frequently be found here.
No resort fees!
Major plus.
Generally nice views from the rooms and plenty of bathroom counter space.
Approx 1,000 times more than at the nearby Fremont (see my separate review on that joint).
Great location on Fremont St. Center of the action and a McDonald's right inside (I'm so glad they kept that).
THE absolute BEST steakhouse I've visited anywhere.
Named Andiamo, this restaurant even beats Vic & Anthony's at Golden Nugget.
Best food, service, personality, ambiance, and value.
Worth a special trip.
American Coney Island, the finest hot dog place in the world, is also located right inside and is open 24/7 (just like McDs).
Cons:   1.
The rooms are really still the same old Fitz rooms.
I got a Premium Corner King and I'd swear it was the exact same room I stayed in years ago.
There's some new furniture and a lot of new artwork.
But mostly, it feels the same.
Ever limbo?
You'll need to if you plan to sit on the toilet [Every limbo boy and girl, all around the limbo world...Jack be nimble Jack be quick...Jack go under toilet stick...]  2.
Related to #1, old and very weak AC unit.
It's the blower kind that sits directly under the window.
It was SO loud I had to leave the room to make a phone call.
And even on max settings, the room was warm.
I wish they had upgraded to a thermostat.
It would make a huge difference.
Speaking of the rooms, the Premium Corner King room is now considered an upgrade.
Back when this was the Fitz, all you had to do was ask the front desk if they'd put you in one of the many "corner rooms" and they usually would (but you had to ask).
Nearly every time I got this as part of the standard room simply by asking.
But it's a paid upgrade now.
Front desk staff is most unkind.
I'd read this on some recent reviews and found it hard to believe.
Figured maybe some of the reviewers simply brought some attitude with them and got some back.
But no.
When I checked in and asked for two room keys, the girl at the front desk protested.
"But you are only one person.
So you only get one key.
"  Okay fine, no big deal.
But then a manager whispered something in her ear and I got two anyway.
But I really didn't understand what all the fuss was about.
It was overall a very surly check-in experience.
I'm really not used to that.
Oh well, I figured she just had a bad day.
Then I had a different person, a guy, for check-out.
Same thing.
He mumbled, barely made eye contact, and didn't even give me my statement until I finally asked for it.
Strange.
Come on, guys!
I know Derek is not that hard to work for.
Lighten up!
So all in all, I like the place but only to visit.
I'd recommend eating, playing, watching sports, and just generally hanging out there.
But staying?
As in for a sleepover?
Mmmmm not so much.
That was probably my last time getting a room here.
Depends on what you like, but I can't do the rooms here again.
While I'll slumber someplace else, I do plan to drop by and be a "regular" on any future trips.

I thought that I would never say that I am impressed or pleased with a casino downtown, but the D is pretty awesome.
They have go-go dancers and they play very good, up-to-date music that people in their 20s and 30s listen to.
Nice decor.
Machines don't pay so you have to gamble local.

i really enjoyed my stay here for my first time staying downtown.
The casino was nice and the drinks were strong.
The pool was outside and very small which didnt look like fun lol.
Rooms were nice and very comfortable.
The only problem i had really was our room was right above the band that was outside.
The band doesnt stop playing till 2am so if your looking to get some sleep you will need ear plugs.
I would stay here again .

At first I thought the D was a really small place but after going upstairs it was a lot of fun.
The horse races upstairs was so much fun.
My uncle won like $150.
You guess which horses were going to win.
It is pretty small though.

1 star for the creative hotel name.
1 star for having my Wheel of Fortune Slot machines.
1 star for the long bar outside with those fruity slushy drinks.
Located right in the Fremont Experience.
A mixture of old slot machines and new ones.
Girls dancing on tables in the table games area.
Nothing too exciting.
Fellas, now there's a place where you can "give her the D at the D"  Just don't end up with a STD.

Super friendly staff and wonderfully renovated rooms.
I was a little nervous about staying at an older hotel on Fremont Street.
Once I was welcomed into The D and saw our room, all of my fears went out the window.
Everything was clean and up to standard.
(Last Vegas trip, our room smelled like wet dog and I was not comfortable in the bathroom.
) I really loved the red feature wall.
It was a two queen room and there was more than sufficient space for 3 people and all the luggage.
We had a view of the ziplines, but to be fair, I wasn't in Vegas for a view, I was in Vegas for the experience of Vegas.
It was easy access to The Fremont Street Experience, the casino opened up to the street.
It is centrally located, so access to buses to the Strip was idea.
They had a pool, unfortunately, we didn't have an opportunity.
The McDonald's in the lobby was convenient.
The D Grill on the second floor is perfect for all tastes.
I just really enjoyed my time there.

I DO NOT RECOMMENDED AT ALL!!
Room was not great at all and the pool is a joke.
When we called and told them about our horrible experience, they did give us two free nights though.

"You get what you pay for," as many will tell you.
But sometimes a great value like the D Hotel comes along, and subverts that entire axiom.
We were in Vegas for just a couple of days and did not mind being away from the strip.
The room was just a regular standard room with a king bed, and it was so much more than the guesses our nightly rate of $64 would generate.
The room was simply decorated, but very clean.
The room was spacious, the bed was soft and very comfortable, and the little stylistic features of the room made the entire thing feel more like a 4-star hotel.
There were also other little things about the room that you don't really get with a "cheap" Vegas option.
Yes, the TV, minifridge, phone, iron & ironing board were all there and worked as expected, but you there were some touches of class that you wouldn't normally expect.
How about the nice spacious bathroom?
Or the large mirror by the window, or the stylish pair of lamps on either side of the bed?
I've stayed at the Vdara, Aria, Planet Hollywood Towers, Treasure Island, and other 4-star-and-up hotels, in addition to more economical alternatives such as Hooters and Imperial Palace.
The D Hotel is a lot closer to the former group than the latter.
If being downtown instead of on the strip is no problem for you, give this place a try.
It actually worked out for us to be here instead on the strip because we were able to take the freeway to the hot spots.
You probably remember how sad you feel for those drivers inching forward once every few minutes on a Saturday night as you're walking past a whole mile of them on your way to Marquee.
That wasn't a problem for us; we got from downtown to the the parking structure at New York New York in about 7 minutes.
I'm giving it a 4 instead of a 5 because of the parking situation.
It's a validation system and it's kind of a pain to get your ticket validated each time.
The hotel offers a day-long validated ticket but the system rejected two of these, so don't bother.
There are 11 floors in the structure, but 6 of them are for valets and there really aren't that many spots left.
This could be an annoying issue.
I got extremely lucky and landed the LAST spot in the whole garage two separate times, but I don't think that'd repeat.
All in all, a great option for Vegas.
Apparently their steakhouse is amazing too.
Maybe I'll try it next time.

THE D exceeded my expectations.
It is a vast improvement over Fitzgerald's.
The hotel rooms - and I had a standard king - are better than most places downtown.
Like everything downtown, the Golden Nugget has the best hotel rooms and then the argument of second-best is up for grabs.
The standard rooms at THE D are not as spacious as the El Cortez Tower rooms but the decor and atmosphere, comfort of the bed and size of the bathroom are superior.
Andiano's Steak House is a great restaurant.
Tried it for the first time and will be back when we visit Vegas again whether or not we stay at THE D.  We did not see a show here and frankly the management could do a better job promoting their shows - did not even notice they had a topless revue and the only mention of the SCINTAS at their hotel was an advertisement on the wall of the hotel elevator.
The staff was friendly and competent.
The dealers are all a little more pleasant and alert at THE D than at a lot of the casinos downtown that specialize in "zombie" syndrome going thru the motions at their job.

Wife and I went to Las Vegas this weekend and wanted to spend at least one night on Fremont Street.
We were walking around and we saw the D Hotel.
The ambiance in the casino was nice and relaxed.
We got a room on short notice, which was nice, and then proceeded to check in.
The room itself was decent.
A king size bed, two chairs, and a little table.
The bathroom was just a standard bathroom with a shower tub, sink, and mirror.
It appeared as though this place had been bought, and just given a fresh coat of paint.
The ceilings still had popcorn all over them.
They didn't tell us that rooms on the odd side of the hotel will catch ALL of the  noise from Fremont street.
So while the live band was still playing at 2am, the front desk said they would move us to the other side and that apparently it was our fault for not asking in the first place.
So we move to our second room.
We get in at 2am, get unpacked, turn on the AC and it sounds like its broken.
Its shaking and making a horrible noise.
I walk over to inspect the unit and it falls out of the wall......I could see the outside from the hole in the wall where the AC should be.
So now my wife is pissed off, she walks down and gets up moved again.
So now we are finally in the third room a little after 3am.
It was just as bad as the others, but the AC didnt make that much noise.
And it wouldnt matter by that time.
With a 6 hour drive and another 10 hours of walking around vegas, we were ready to sleep.
The only pro of this entire place is the Valet staff and Bell Staff.
They were all very nice and courteous.
Such nice people, its sad the place they work for doesn't do a good job supporting them.

Stayed here for EDC 2013.
Great time.
Nice rooms.
Gaming don't pay out too well.
I will be back.

This is a nice new trendy place (by new I mean redone- it was The Fitzgeralds) right in downtown Las Vegas.
The rooms have had a light makeover with fresh new bedding, mattresses,  curtains, carpet.
I think the furniture might be old or at least it looked kind of 80s.
The bathrooms have not been redone but they are fine and the shower curtains are new.
We paid around $50/night so I thought it was a bargain considering the remodeling investment they've made and the fact that it's well located on Fremont St.
The a/c units don't work that great but when I mentioned it to the front desk they sent someone up quickly to fix it.
I would recomment this place.
Small pool area.
This isn't a place for kids.
Then again, Vegas isn't a place for kids in my opinion.

When tourists ask me about cheap places to stay in Vegas, I always recommend staying downtown.
I love downtown Vegas and it can be a very convenient and cost-effective place to stay.
And like most downtown hotels, The D has undergone a makeover and update.
(It used to be Fitzgerald's.
)  The price was great for our stay here.
Stayed for 5 nights for less than $200.
The rooms were good.
There's only so much you can do to update an old building.
But the furnishings were nice and the bed was comfy.
The A/C was still an under-window unit, but it worked surprisingly well.
And the bathroom was decent too.
3.5 stars.
The casino itself is nice and very much updated.
Good options all around.
And it has the longest bar in Nevada.
I love the upstairs retro casino.
There's nothing quite like carrying around buckets of quarters.
I could've sat forever playing the horse derby game.
And cocktail waitresses came around frequently.
4 stars.
The dining options are lackluster, but there's tons of other options in the immediate area, so that was no biggie.
2 stars.
Valet was relatively quick every time.
It was easy to get in and out, and took just minutes to get to the Strip.
Again, downtown is a very convenient location - and where The D is situated is particularly convenient.
And despite what it says on their website and what I was told when I checked in, valet does not cost anything.
It is free (though, you should tip), just like every place on the Strip.
3 stars.
The pool is horrible.
But that's pretty much the case with all of the downtown hotels (with the exception of the Golden Nugget).
It was just a crappy apartment complex pool.
Crappy lounge chairs, no bar, small, etc., etc.
But hey, you can always go to one of the pools on the Strip to hang out.
1 star.
It is the staff and check-in desk that pretty much ruined our stay.
They had our reservation wrong, despite me having a print out of it and me having called to confirm it after booking online - which means they tried to charge us more.
They screwed up the charges on my credit card, which resulted in our room keys not working every single night.
And no one noticed the problem until our last night there.
It was incredibly frustrating.
And if my extremely lengthy amounts of time waiting in line at the check-in desk taught me anything, it was that I was not alone.
There were some pretty big guest issues every single night.
And, of course, they only had one person working at night and no manager.
1 star.
So while I would normally stay here again based on the price and room quality, I won't because of the hassles, frustrations, and staff.
But I do wholeheartedly recommend coming here for some retro gaming.

I'm from Detroit and I played the Michael Jackson Machine which is Motown Music originally and I won $236 bucks.
The stars were aligned I guess you could say.
Nice place that is clean and hot dancers dancing on all the table games which was a nice touch.
Very Long stocked bar!

Really impressed with the hotel.. will be going back..I expected seedy because it is on Freak Street but it is actually really nice..

Coming from one of the most negative writers on Yelp, I cannot say enough GREAT things about The D Hotel and Casino.
Simply put, it is the BEST thing to happen to Las Vegas in a long time!
I had to come to Vegas to attend a friend's birthday celebration.
My friends and I decided to stay at The D because we enjoy staying in downtown and away from all the donkey tourists on The Strip.
Since the Golden Nugget's customer service has gone out the window (See my Nugget review) we decided to gamble on staying at The D....and the dice came up 7!
I have to admit I was very skeptical about staying here, having read the previous reviews about the lack of A.C., long lines for the elevators, and noisy rooms.
However I was pleasantly surprised once I checked in for the weekend.
Upon quickly dropping off my car at valet, I was SHOCKED to see NO line at the check in counter!
(This is always a big fear of mine as I have no patients, especially for tourists that like to take their sweet time chatting with the employees about nothing)  I checked in quickly and early, I made sure to request a quiet room away from Freemont St. where the party doesn't end until close to 5am.
I also requested a room close to the elevator and got my requests granted, even during a SOLD OUT weekend!
The trick to keeping your room ice cold is to keep your curtains closed during the day, this will keep the 108 degree sun from preheating the room like an oven.
The beds here are extremely comfortable and had a GREAT nights sleep every night!
There were NO lines for the elevators the entire weekend I stayed, and none of them broke down.
My stay here was EXCELLENT!
The service at The D is simply OUTSTANDING!
While other Las Vegas hotels have stopped trying, The D goes above and beyond to serve their guests and make your stay as comfortable and enjoyable as possible!
I haven't been this impressed with a hotel in Vegas since The Mirage first opened.
This hotel without a doubt is one of the BEST bangs for your Las Vegas buck!
The Casino: The casino is VERY cool, young and hip!
It has a GREAT vibe throughout and the late night Go-Go dancers above the table games are a nice touch.
But perhaps the BEST part of The D's casino is the Vintage style gaming located on the 2nd floor.
This is where she sits......One of the BEST games EVER created for a Las Vegas casino......One of ONLY 3 left in existence (If you count the one sitting in an undisclosed Las Vegas warehouse).......Ladies and Gentlemen....THE SIGMA DERBY!
a.k.a.
The Plastic Ponies.
One of my favorite games, and the only one that will pull me out of a Poker Room.
Yes, The D has a Sigma Derby and it is BEAUTIFUL!
In addition, the rest of the 2nd floor consists of vintage style slots and video poker machines complete with "Coin Fall".
Buckets included.
I am predicting The D will single-handedly be responsible for building up downtown Las Vegas again.
The Show: I took the guys to see the "Raack N Roll" show at The D, this was a FUN show consisting of topless female dancers with absolutely AMAZING bodies!
One of the better dance shows Las Vegas has to offer.
The Bottom Line: As I always say, Las Vegas was better when the mob ran it.
But The D is the best thing to happen to Las Vegas in a long time and is a GIANT step in the right direction!
As much as I dislike what Vegas has become, I would stay at The D again in a second, and encourage others to as well.
You will not be disappointed.
Enjoy!

THE GOOD: Its downtown.
If you havent been downtown in a while, its time to go.
This stay started out great, but lost some steam each day, and ultimately failed.
Good check-in, great clerk.
Nice room on the 25th floor.
Arrived for First Friday, caught the shuttle to the Arts District for the fest.
All good; a bunch o' fun.
THE BAD: Either one or two of the 4 elevators were down the entire stay.
Very long waits to and from the room.
Took the stairs down once but the stairwell dumps you out into the hotel's back alley which is probably not where you want to hang...
THE UGLY: On Sunday night about 1:00am, construction began on the room renovation directly above our room (this would not have been a problem on Friday or Saturday, but Monday morning?, yeah, thats gonna be a problem...)  Could NOT sleep through it.
Called front desk, they said we had to move rooms, so at 1:30am, we shlepped our bags down to the 17th floor to escape the cacophony.
The hotel apologized and comp'd us $50 food/beverage credit for the inconvenience.
Later that morning, we got up, not well rested--oh well, its vegas after all--and ate breakfast at the D Grill (you may want to read the separate review for this place before going), and charged it to the room against the comped credit.
Found out later they never comped the $50 to the room and I got charged for everything.
In the process of discovering this, I found out: The D and Golden Gate will implement a $20/night resort fee as of August 19, 2013, so thats really a nail in the ol' coffin -- er, the ol' Fitzgeralds, er, The D Hotel.
GRADE: In this case, lets just let the hotel's name speak for itself: D

My friends had some vouchers to spend here so we popped in for a bit while crusing around Fremont.
The most interesting thing about this place I think is the fact all the dealers and go go dancers were attractive young women wearing the same outfits.
We were wondering if they took turns being dealers AND go go dancers.
We didn't stay long enough to find out for sure, but my friend did mention that the dealer he had seemed a little clueless about something so perhaps that's their deal.
--LIL UPDATE--  One of the employees messaged me and let me know that they DO Dance and Deal, so there you go!

As of August 2013, the D now charges a $20 resort fee.
Ugh.
I guess it was just a matter of time.
So scratch that from my "pros" list.

Never stayed at their hotel, but the casino is pretty much the same as the others.
The long bar outside the casino is right in the mix of the Fremont Experience.
They have those alcoholic slushie machines and any kind of regular liquor you want.
This place got us started to a good time at the Fremont Experience.

So for an old hotel/casino, it's not bad w the facelift but like most of the reviews on hotel sites, their plumbing really does sucks.
~ THE GOOD ~ - nicely new renovation  ~ THE BAD ~ - plumbing is bad - very thin walls so you can hear a lot - it is very loud as they play concerts right below us - during the late noon time, elevator takes forever ESP since you can only have 10 people max in there - in the late morning, water is not available for half hour (so no sink, shower or toilet).
- 5 small pillows vs regular sized pillow  Overall, I didn't have that bad of an experience.
Just listing the food and bad that I noticed.

Don't valet your car here!
I had $300 stolen from my car when I valet here.
The valet person searched my car for my purse and went through my purse and stole all but $1.00.
I am trying to get the D hotel to reimburse me..
I'm not holding my breath!

I appreciate what the owner has done with the place and how he runs the joint, but I'm not aboard yet.
- Checkin here is a pretty inefficient process - Resort fees are a cost of doing business now, but $20?
Says you get free wifi, but when you go to log in it says its $10 a day.
I assume you can just reconcile the bill at the desk at checkout, but for a supposedly budget joint and area I'm confused by the nickel and diming.
A lot of Strip casinos don't charge you $20.
- What is the point of having the longest bar in Vegas if you staff it as if its a Starbucks kiosk?
Two bartenders on a Friday afternoon was frustrating.
- Basic room, fine enough but my remote didn't work and the channel button on the tv changed the setting.
#tvfail  Good things?
- Hopping casino  - Owner who is visible and cares.

After many years of hotels on the strip, my friends and I decided to do a 3-day weekend in downtown Vegas.
We stumbled across The D and it turned out to be the best decision ever.
Newly remodeled rooms, great staff and loose slots.
What more could we ask for.
We will return to The D!

Stayed here over the weekend and I can't complain much.
Front desk person was a gentleman and was nothing but pleasant.
Provided a verbal tour of the entire casino.
Check in was speedy and smooth.
Room was nothing out of the ordinary.
Bed was comfortable.
Plenty of pillows provided (major plus!).
Cons-noise outside can be heard.
If you are one to sleep or fall asleep before midnight, you might end up waking up cranky because of the noise from outside, be it a public concert or crowd.
-does not have much cable channel offered.
There must have been less than 8 channels.
-this one really is the reason why I only gave 3 stats.
The darn resort fees!
$22/night resort fee.
After I acknowledged such, I mind started to ponder.
What exactly is a resort fee?
The only resort related venue I could think of was the pool area.
Casino did not have (to my knowledge) a spa center, or a fitness center to justify the fee(s).
Overall, I would come to this "resort" again if I get a free night stay or whatever they have special going on.
Other than that, not my first choice.

Very classy casino representing Detroit on Freemont Street in downtown Las Vegas.
Has live entertainment.
The dealers dance, they rotate but it is fun to watch.
Not confirmed but I am sure The D stands for Detroit they even have a National Coney Island jus like in the D.  We actually got free play we signed up for players cards.
And won a bit on machines.
Will make it back here for sure on our 5th trip back to Vegas in the future.
We even seen a show got buy one get one free ticket coupon from a local tour guide magazine on Vegas.

Picked up my Uncle and got him checked in.
Lugged his stuff up to his room and then made arrangements to meet downstairs after he unpacked and relaxed a bit.
Went to the Long Bar, only a few patrons on the bar.
Contemplated whether I would play a little video poker when I was approached by the bartender Antwon - I simply asked for a glass of water to start.
He asked if I were staying at the D or planning on playing.
I replied that I was not staying, and not sure if I was going to play.
He informed me in a curt tone that since I was not a guest nor was I playing that he could not serve me a glass of water.
He then just walked away.
I was shocked to say the least.
I was in a newer tee shirt and shorts, I did not smell, but felt I was treated like a vagrant.
I did not ask for a free beer, or liquor - simply a glass of water and was treated like shit.
I come to Vegas on a regular basis and am usually downtown.
I thought the D had done a fabulous job on the rooms, casino and atmosphere of the facilities, but I guess I had it wrong.
I will NEVER set foot in this property again, not to play a penny or to eat.
I will be sure to let my friends know how i was treated.

Had a blast at the tables!
Dealers were fun and we won!
Would go back next time in Vegas!

I would not recommend this hotel to anyone unless you are staying for a short one or two night trip and plan on staying out of your room most of the time.
Better customer service would have changed my entire experience.
Pros: -well priced rooms (except the resort fee) -new furniture and curtains -if you're a guest valet is free (no one at the hotel told me)  -bath & body works products in the restrooms   Cons: -1 star customer service level - employees at the front desk seem as if they expect complaints and warn you about everything negative without telling you about the good things like free valet for guests  -2 out of 3 nights I could not reach the front desk on the phone - bathrooms have not been renovated, fixtures look about 30 years old with modern artwork put up around them -bad plumbing - 2 out of 4 elevators were consistently breaking down with guests stuck inside.
At one point I had to wait 30 minutes to get on the elevator as my room was on the 23rd floor, we crossed our fingers every time we used them - my booking confirmation said I had a coffee maker in the room but soon found out they charge $2.50 to use 1 k-cup -Wifi is $9.99/day to use in the room -$20/day resort fee... No clue what it covered (not wifi or in room coffee) - no gym -no business center  -self parking is free for guests but after they validated my parking on the first day my ticket no longer worked and I ended up paying $1/hr just to get out of the parking structure  -self park is always full as guest parking is only floors 7-11..
I wish they told me about the free valet when I checked in -I could hear everything from the street on the 23rd floor!
Screaming, sirens, a/c units from the parking structure, everything (I didn't ask for a higher floor because the elevators kept breaking down) -only about 10 channels available on the tv

I hate the fact that I have to give this place such a low rating.
Many aspects of it kick ass.
I came to Vegas 9/25/13  for my honeymoon and spent my last night at the D. At check in I specifically asked for a nice room and would pay more.
What they gave me was a room that was standard and next to the stage outside that blared music until late into the night.
After complaints, we were moved to a better room that was quieter.
Needless to say, we love old Vegas  but will stay somewhere else next time

Stayed there three days two nights.
Room was nice and clean hotel was great overall good.
Only fail was the pool , the hot tub was cold and the pool was gross , get a new nice pool

Was happy with the Hotel except the music was WAY , WAY TO LOUD.
I'll be 50 in two years and I love music but please turn it down a bit.
If you go to the second floor and gamble up there it is much more mellow.
Came up there to get married and our best man joined us.
The rooms are neat and clean nice decor.
The only other down fall is the pool which we were looking forward to go but it's almost on the street small and you breath in gas fumes.
Guest check in and valet were all awesome.
Cute hot dancing girl's around.
But everyone please read the rest.
Whatever you do.
DO NOT GO TO ANDIAMO STEAKHOUSE.
I would not even give them a yelp review to there sight I want everyone that checks the reviews to the hotel to read this.
It SUCKS.
So after we got married we really wanted to go here to have a elegant wedding dinner the 3 of us, we really didn't care how much we were going to spend, after all it's our wedding night.
And what a wedding night it was I spent the next 2 day's in bed and my wedding night on the bathroom floor because I had food poisoning.
The 44oz porterhouse steak we ordered MR came out bloody rare and cold, I the bride was the only one who had 2 bites of it, and that's what got me sick, severed with cold plates on top of it.
The lobster bisque with way to much COLD cream fresh did not have one piece of Lobster in it.
The Caesar salad was OK and the lobster risotto was mushy we were so very disappointed and we could not eat anything except the Caesar.
Between the 3 of us combined we have about 60 years of restaurant experience.
One of the servers asked us if we wanted something else but by that time we had lost our appetite and was not interested in anything else.
Would you want something to eat after that.
Then they gave us the bill and said we took off the steak and bisque and some drinks and get this everyone we still had a bill of $110.00 OMG.......
The only nice thing about the place was the manager up front Roxanna was wonderful but I don't think that the other server told her what was going on.
Good luck if you want to eat there.
Hotel you rock maybe turn down the music 2 notches during the day.

I would give negative 10 stars if I could, but I'd really think this would've been a nice place to stay since it's "newly remodeled" plus, it was cheap to stay here anyways.
Whenever visiting Vegas, I always enjoy staying in Downtown Vegas just cause I'm able to see some faces I'd see back at home, so it's comforting.
Don't get me wrong, the hotel is nice.
But the service is surely something else.
I needed a room that could accommodate 5 adults, and 2 young children.
I'd ideally like something that offered 3 queen sized beds, but figured that 2 queens sized beds and a sofa/sofa sleeper would suit us.
Prior to booking our room, I called the hotel personally to find out more information about a double room that I stumbled onto online.
I was told that the double room has a queen size bed in each room, and one of the rooms has a couch as well.
I got off the phone, and called again to speak to someone else to confirm the information that I was told.
(Which it was) So I thought that this would be perfect and continued the reservation.
When arriving at the hotel, we parked the car in the parking structure...and might I say, this is the WORST parking structure ever.
The way it was built was retarded.
I can't recall the right number, but I noticed right off the back that the first four or five floors (parking starts at level 3 & ends at level 11) are all reserved for valet.
It was Bike Fest that weekend, and also noticed most of the stalls for valet & self parking was FULL of bikes.
But the fact that only a few floors for self parking?!
COME ON NOW!
We LITERALLY had to fight for parking almost each time we parked the car.
Checking in was a pain in the ass.
I stood in line.
but managed to have at least 3 people cut in front of me when I was next in line, by walking straight to the person at the counter.
All employees saw that I was standing in line, but never acknowledged anything at all.
RUDE.
After that happening, I even had problems getting checked into my room.
So, we finally checked in & got into our room and to my surprise, it wasn't a double room.
It was just a room with two queen sized beds and NO couch.
Of course, I'm beyond livid after already having trouble checking in, this got my blood boiling.
Called front desk to find out what happened, they apologized for me being angry & stated that the room only comes w/ a couch in a room that has a king sized bed.
I repeatedly told the girl that I was told by two different people about the room prior to booking the room.
So I was stuck with ONE room instead of a DOUBLE room with NO couch.
I threw a fit, and they waived the fee for a rollaway bed.
All in all, I hated my stay here.
Service was horrible, they give you crappy things in the room & overpriced as well.
$4.50 for a bottle of water & $2.50 for a cup of coffee.
Wifi cost $9.99/day.
Oh, and did I mention that this is the ONLY hotel that I've ever stayed in that DIDNT have a mini fridge OR microwave?
Yeah, stupid.
Whenever eating out, we were either forced to either eat all our food or throw it out even if there was a ton of leftovers that we could've easily saved for later.
Walls were thin, could literally hear the conversation the people next door was having.
Housekeeping endlessly opening our door to clean our room even if we put up the "DO NOT DISTURB" sign up.
Go-go dancers were not attractive at all.
Could hear noise from outside.
We often were RUDELY approached by security when we would enter the hotel with our kids at night, even if we were going straight up to the room.
AND I found a bed bug in one of the beds the morning we checked out...GROSS!
In other words, I will NEVER stay here again.
I'd rather bust out a little more money for somewhere I know I'd enjoy staying.

The parking structure sucks.
The service sucks.
The elevators suck.
The rooms suck.
The overpriced water and cup of coffee suck.
Back to the elevators, it clearly has "10 people maximum" engraved onto the elevator, but it gets stuck with only 8???
And the billing sucks.
They overcharged my family and I, and I'm sure they made that mistake to many others because the line for checking out was SUPER LONG.
And I almost forgot, the fucking toilet sucks.
Excuse my language, but whether you're taking a quick piss or a shit, you're gonna be stuck holding down the lever for 10+ seconds just to flush everything down.
Maybe it's just me, but I'd definitely pay a couple of dollars more to stay at the MGM or something because this place sucked.
I DO GIVE PROPS TO THE VALET WORKERS THO, they are speedy!

2 stars for Clean room with very basic amenities.
Loses major points for unfriendly/not very helpful front desk staff.
The girl that checked me in seemed to not really want to answer my questions.
The people that checked me out were a little more helpful.
Their website lies when it says that the shuttle comes every half hour - you actually have to schedule in advance, it doesn't just come.
Would've been nice to know earlier.
The big cons:  - No Free Wi-Fi, which I think is a must have in hotels these days - The Pool closes at 7pm, which is completely stupid.
What pool closes that early?!
- walls are paper thin.
Could hear the concert outside from my room, and I was on the 12th floor.
Was woken up at 730am by slamming doors and then again at 8 by the vacuum and loud housekeeping staff.
Building creaks constantly throughout the night.
You can clearly hear your neighbors conversations and a/c running.
- When I was walking through the casino, one of the workers with the earbuds ran straight into me from behind, without even trying to say excuse me or sorry.
Rude.
-this is kind of a stupid complaint, but the way the sink was installed in the bathroom was not good.
The spout for the water was set too far back in the marble, so you couldn't really reach your hands under the water stream to wash them   Pros:   -Room was clean, and didn't smell bad (non-smoking) -Had basic amenities that worked for me (hair dryer, big mirror in bathroom, nice bathtub, a TV) - pretty alright view  -I could walk to Dunkin donuts in the morning to get a coffee.
-The concert I went to see was directly below my hotel.
So I guess the proximity to everything downtown is great.
It's not a bad place to stay if you're completely on a budget and want to check out the Fremont st experience (which I definitely had a good time at).
I personally probably won't stay here again - I like the strip hotels experience better for the higher quality service.

Overall, I liked The D, but my impression was spoiled by the non-caring VALET GUYS at the very end of our stay.
I like the fact that, unlike The Golden Nugget, The D's parking garage is connected directly to the hotel.
Arriving late at night, I do not like to catch an elevator down to the ground floor, roll baggage across a driveway into the hotel lobby, then catch another elevator up to the room, upon checking in.
The D's registration is conveniently connected to the parking garage and located near the elevator on the ground floor.
The very warm and friendly registration gal gave us a room overlooking the mountains on the 33rd floor.
The rooms have been renovated and although not everything is spanking new and replaced (chipped bathroom tile floor, hanging metal from shower head), the room was functional for our needs.
Most importantly, my Mother and I found it to be spacious and clean.
I liked the Keurig coffeemaker for my tea-making needs but did not use the K-cups because there is a hefty charge.
Our 33rd floor housekeeper was very accommodating.
We had a little trouble with a disappearing DND sign twice and the long-term parking ticket malfunctioning twice upon exiting the parking structure, but that was nothing compared to our valet experience upon leaving the hotel.
On our last day, we were directed to valet the car because self-parking was full from the evening Downtown activities.
I'd like to mention here that the valet guys in general need to be trained in customer care.
Often, the valet is the LAST impression left with a hotel guest, and as in this case, can make or break the overall hotel experience.
The valet should not expect that hotel guests will know exactly what to do when valeting a car.
Unfriendly Valet Guy #1 who received the car caused me concern about leaving my rental with someone as unfriendly as him.
He did not offer a greeting and did not prepare me with any instructions on how to go about leaving the car and retaining the valet stub until I asked - hey, some of us NEVER valet our regular cars...perhaps this is the reason why.
Anyway, upon retrieving the car, Unfriendly Valet Guy #2 takes the valet stub and walks away without saying anything.
My Mother and I proceeded outside with our 2 suitcases and 2 carry-ons and after standing in the driveway for a bit, another valet guy (the only one who smiled) tells us that if we are waiting for our car, we should be standing across the way in a separate area.
I told him, "Thanks for telling us!
" I was most disgusted with Unfriendly Valet Guy #2 who drove the car to us and who I tipped $5 prematurely.
(Blame it on sleep deprivation and my overly-generous Mother).
Yup, #2 eagerly accepted the tip and then, just stood there holding the driver's door open while watching me and my 77 year old Mother struggle to put the baggage into the trunk.
Personally, I was not intending to tip at all, because the hotel forced its guests to valet and The D charges a $20 daily resort fee.
Thanks for teaching me to hold on to the tip until the very end next time!

It has been several years since I was last here.
I was surprised to walk up and see it had been remodeled.
It sure looks better than before.
Walking around, I can see a lot of the improvements are cosmetic.
They still carried some items over the the Fitzgerald like the stone for good luck.
The dancing girls are the biggest noticeable change when you walk up or through the casino.
I have not stayed here yet but I am interested after the remodel.

This felt similar to our stay at the Flamingo - they've remodeled the hotel so it looks nice, but there were still some really basic problems.
My bf said "You can put lipstick on a pig...."  The bathroom is clean, but clearly never renovated.
The sink is really weird and ours happened to be completely stopped up.
Our toilet was also running all night long, so we had to have maintenance come fix everything.
I think it's absurd to make guests pay for Wi-Fi, but even worse when it barely works!
We were at a trade show all day long and came back to a mountain of work that took 10x longer to accomplish purely because the internet was spotty at best.
The kicker is when you pay for internet, it only works on ONE device.
You have to pay per device!
That is highway robbery.
Eventually management worked with us to sort out all our issues and even refunded us, so I was thankful for that.
Although it was nice to be downtown and experience Fremont Street, I can't recommend it if you have business on the strip.
Getting to the convention center in the mornings was a nightmare.

Dark, with low ceilings, the D Casino is an OK place.
We came here to play the quarter horse racing game on the second floor.
It's cheap and fun.
Other than that it is similar to most casinos downtown.

I don't recall this hotel being as loud as it was the first time I stayed here.
It was Fitzgerald's Holiday Inn back in the mid nineties and the boulevard was quieter back then.
There's no way anyone can sleep at the D Hotel without the help of meds!
Even though my room was on the 14th floor, the retro design with its popcorn walls, dark colors and bland furniture, it felt like a dungeon (though I've never stayed in one).
The casino and outside bar featuring some of the best  bartenders are worth visiting.
The 2nd floor features the old slot machines and a horse race track which can only be described as something I've never seen before but it reminds me of a carni horse race game with the water guns even though it's nothing like that.
You'll just have to see it for yourself if you're into vintage gaming.
We ate at the D Grill on our first day of arrival.
The food is OK.
The front desk gave us an expired coupon with our guest room keys so that proved useless.
This is the last time I choose to reserve a sleeping room in the downtown area.
I want to play hard and be able to recoup, recover and do it all over.
It's not possible when my sleep is disrupted.
The bands don't stop performing, the new construction for Slotzilla begins at 11PM.... it's Halloween every night on Fremont Street.
Sin city has turned into crazy town; at least in this part of Vegas.
I'm a glutton for punishment.
I appreciate that there are 2 faces of this city.
There's no chance in hell any visit will be alike!

The former Fitzgerald's casino, the new owner renovated it to look like an old school Vegas joint.
Complete with a section of a machines on the 2nd floor that operate on coins, they did a pretty good job with the design of the place.
One of the signature features is a giant bar down on the first floor just inside the entrance...pretty cool place to hang out and grab a drink.
The casino's first floor has a lot of energy and attracts a younger age demographic than most of the other casinos on Fremont St.
It feels like a house party.
It's 100x better than the old Fitzgerald's, kudos to the owners for taking a chance and renovating it!
Return Factor - 75%

Apparently it's all about the D on Fremont street.
It's a swanky joint with some very high end games, complete with a smoking platform just outside their 2nd story over looking the Fremont experience.
Their restrooms (The reason I went inside) were spic and span, and quite well appointed.
In the main room, the poker games have dance tables between them, and on each platform is a scantily clad girl in a bra and panty set.
As I walked through, the music queued up, something by Rhianna, and the girls all began to do a dance number.
Granted, it wasn't a hard number, and they weren't all in synch, but it wasn't terrible and they provided some necessary distraction, I'm certain.
It's a nice looking place, I'll come back to play when I'm back down at the FSE.

Yes it's one of the more updated downtown casinos but I wasn't feeling it.
All of the workers I encountered were very friendly and helpful.
The casino is small.
Hate the parking here,will never ever park here again, it's a head on accident waiting to happen.
Luckily I broke even that night and had a few good drinks.
I won't go back by choice.

The D is definitely one of the best casinos downtown.
It's always a party at The D.  The moment you see it walking down freemont experience you see dancing bartenders in cute sexy red outfits :) serving up slushies and dancing to the bands music.
Walk in to see the worlds longest bar :) hence the name Long bar :) with the best flair bartenders you will ever meet.
They are not only serving you drinks but an experience.
They are the funniest and nicest bartenders for sure.
And of course I can't forget to tell you about the party pit.
Sexy dancing dealers ready to make sure you have a fun time making money on black jack or the carnival games, roulette, craps, big six ....
Even the regular dealers are a blast to play games with.
You will not find a friendlier place to gamble.
I promise.
Moving on to the second floor of the casino.
You find vintage Vegas.
The entire 2nd floor you can gamble on machines like back in the day when you didn't receive a ticket to redeem when you cashed out but quarters and dimes and nickels and pennies :) ding ding ding ding ding just like you see in the movies :)  They also have two restaurants.
Casual dining: the d grill.
Fine dining: Andiamo steak house :)))))  You have to try the crme brle it's phenomenal :)  The chef at Andiamo is also the sweetest man you can have the pleasure of meeting.
The D is definitely a must if you are downtown in Vegas.
Shoot I even recommend it to locals.
And most definitely everyone from Detroit.
Oh shoot how could I forget.
The D also has Coney Island.
Pretty yummy hot dog joint :)

This us a great hotel, it's an old building that has been renovated to the max.
Great rooms, great casino and if course right on Fremont Street.

It's as good a place as any to stay downtown.
If you haven't visited downtown, it's certainly worth the trip.
People watching's much more 'interesting' & varied.
The overhead screen's entertaining, and downtown has low limit (training wheel) tables.
We were in 1007 & heard that the even numbers listen to the band right outside the window.
Could be a problem if you're going to vegas to sleep.

I checked in at The D hours ago and I am already compelled to leave a review.
While I am impressed at the upgrades for the rooms, the resort fee and the "benefits" you receive are appalling.
In fairness, I did book the room for under $20/night, but the $20+tax resort fee they collect is one of the highest in town.
I've stayed at a ton of hotels and it seems around $12.95 is the norm.
At most hotels, this includes wifi, fitness center access, in-room coffee, local calls, and sometimes a couple of bottles of water.
I think at Circus Circus they gave me daily coupons for a coffee at their coffee bar.
At the D, you get their lowest tear of wifi service, which seems to be a reasonable speed.
There is no fitness center.
They have Keurigs in the room, but they charge an outrageous $2.50 to use a capsule.
These are capsules you can buy retail for around $0.33 each, and I guarantee you The D is not paying retail for this.
It really feels like a money grab, and it is just disgusting to have one of the highest resort fees in town with the lowest amount of benefits.
Front desk staff agreed with me on everything I mentioned above but put blame on the CEO, Derek Stevens, who will drive out a regular clientele if nickel and dime-ing locals is their goal.
I was much happier at the El Cortez.
My non-smoking room also smells like smoke, and I had to park on the 7th floor even though there were floors and floors of empty parking because they reserved the first 6 floors for valet.
Was going to gamble at the bar to have a scotch but was told they couldn't comp any single malts, and the only blended scotch they could comp was Dewars.
More proof this place has cheap owners.

Bleh...they "remodeled" it, but if you put lipstick on a pig, it's still a pig.
The place felt old, the water pressure sucked, the TV was smaller than the TV I have on my patio, and the "upgraded corner king" room was smaller than the standard rooms at the Golden Nugget.
Stay somewhere else, unless you have lower expectations of what a hotel should be.

The D is a great modern remodel of an old downtown hotel (Fitzgerald).
NOTE:  The lucky Blarney Stone is still upstairs for the rubbing (or kissing if you dare).
The Long D Bar downstairs is modern with some more than domestic drafts and plenty of flat panel TVs to watch the games.
The remodel was money well spent to keep some modern comforts to a mostly dated Fremont street experience.
Be sure to check out the vintage slots upstairs that still take coins and give you the winnings in coins that you can place in an old timey plastic cup.
They even have that old horse race game where the metal horses race around a track under a glass dome while you and a bunch of strangers sit in the round and bet on the odds with coins.
There is a cool patio access off the second floor bar that gives you a nice view of Fremont Street below.

This review is for the show: "Laughternoon with Adam London"  The seating is first come, first served so get there early.
The showroom is shared by all the shows at the D - Murder/mystery dinner, Raack and Roll and another I can't think of at the moment.
The seats are laid out with 8 to a table but it's not really cramped.
A bar area is readily accessible.
While the show isn't exactly the most high tech production, and the jokes can be a little cheesy, the magic was really good.
The jokes got better the more the audience interacted and while kids were present, a lot of the more "adult" jokes went over their heads.
I went to the show not expecting much.
But by the end, I was having a great time and thoroughly entertained.
I will definitely go back and invite more friends.

Don't let the smooth name fool ya,,, the hotel was cheesy.
They took out the mini frig  and the heater was so loud I could not hear the TV.
No extra blanket in the room , not unless its free, I will not be returning

Don't stay here.
I asked for the Casino manager to help resolve an issue and he treated me horrible and made me feel unwanted.
Never had such terrible customer service.
Worst hotel ever.
Don't waste your money.

I just stayed three nights at the D hotel in Las Vegas, The staff was excellent.
Every need or concern I had was taken care of for me.
The room was comfortable and the bed excellent.
What I was impressed with the most was the speed of the elevators.
The only negative is the room to room noise level.
You can at times actually hear conversations from other rooms.
I think it comes from the windows that do not appear to have good sealing between rooms along the window side.
For the money in downtown Vegas I would highly recommend staying at the D.

I stayed here over new years eve and no complaints.
Lots of haters on Yelp.
You get what you pay for.
I  paid an average to low price to stay here and had a blast.
If a hater needs luxury, then take your azz to the strip and pay for it.
I was here to party, skanky go go girls and all.
Now the hotties dancing on the outside bars, thats another story.
Food good, people good, not a bad place for DOWNTOWN vegas.

Service 4 stars Casino 4 stars Staff 4 stars Rooms 3 stars Location 3 stars Resort fee 22.60 Room Bottled Water$4.50/Cup Coffee $2.50   If I knew more about Vegas, it was not CES (largest US convention) time of year, I had significant money to blow and I was not somewhat "street-smart" I probably would not have stayed here.
But be all that as it may; I am easy to please and adventuresome and safe when travelling so I made the best of my experience here.
First off, let me say that if you plan to enjoy "The Strip" a great deal then this will NOT be the place for you.
Transportation back and forth gets very expensive and taking the shuttle's or city buses can be a little annoying and/or seedy.
I myself enjoy places with an earthy vibe and all walks of life (within reason).
So as I was only staying a few days/nights it worked out mostly and if I wanted to primarily enjoy this little (Poor Man's Vegas) area again I would come back just to get away from some of the showy, superficial, slick activity/folks in Vegas.
What I see here is that they're trying to do major revitalization to this area and I feel like in about 5 to 7 years it will be aces!!!
Already there are some amazing amenities, features, eateries and development .
The owner of the d is a visionary who sees the diamond in the rough and is spot on in leading the way to the redevelopment here in downtown.
Hotel has been fabulously modernized and was a decent stay for the most part.
It is clean warm and perfectly located near so much tht you can truly get all you need either within the hotel or very close by.
Beds are soooo comfy; staff are talented, efficient and quite helpful - honestly I feel as though they are top notch as far as customer service and that is a huge plus!
Casino is also nice; I am not a huge gambler but I won a little more here than anywhere else - just on the slots.
Only potential downsides are the ease of hearing noise fr other rooms and Fremont music experience as well as the fact that if the strip will be a daily destination for you this might be too far.

This review is for the casino and bar only.
Cute vintage slots.
Good cocktail service at the table games.
Fun plastic horse racing game.
Slots that take quarters and that give tokens.
If you like slots and coin buckets, this is not bad.
They have some newer slots too.
More vintage games would be cool.
Decent downtown location.

What can I say...
The D is awesome.
If you are looking for a high energy casino, this is it.
Walking in this place is like getting a shot of adrenalin infused red bull injected directly into your heart.
The Longbar was hopping even on a Sunday night and the dancing dealers were getting their groove on.
The pop dance music sets the party atmosphere.
Table games offer reasonable limits (mostly $10 for blackjack and $5 for craps).
Location is great...
Right at the end of the Fremont canopy near Neonopolis and the Fremont east bar scene.
Check it out.

This is gonna be a very short review.
I guess the point of my reviews is to alert like- minded people about my experiences at places.
Just in case people share my views, I like to make them aware of what they might experience if they patronize a place I've been to.
I Iike to spend money at places I enjoy, and avoid spending money at places I don't.
That being said, we went to the D bar near the Fremont st. door.
The bartender was very rude to my boyfriend.
Then the bartender carded me (36) for a club soda.
When I refused to show my Id, he refused to give me my fizzy water.
If you hate obnoxious stuff like that- go elsewhere.
Together we can put places like this out of business!

Very nice remodel.
Other than a red wall, the rooms are as nice as, well, a Holiday Inn nice.
But for the price I paid, $23 (+ $22 resort fee), it's well worth it.
Noise from Fremont street effected my 16th floor room.
Yikes.
If booked on a Friday or Saturday night, this might very well be a bother.
The Long Bar (yeah, that's what it's called), is the focal point and is quite impressive.
Literally, a long ass bar with TV's all along the way, and multiple bartenders doing there thing.
Outside, it's directly on the fabulously touristy Fremont Street.
There is an outside bar, maybe as long as the one inside.
It has a regular bar, and it's upscale.
To the right, 50 flavors of daquiri's hosted by a sexy mistress type.
I had banana, and it knocked my socks off.
During the day, 55+ year old cocktail waitresses.
Not hip.
Not cool.
But as the day turns into night, they get younger and the hotness turns from lukewarm to nearly hot.
Multiple go-go dancers, up to 6, are in the table area, and well, are quite steamy.
The casino is small and very smokey.
The clientele has cigarettes butts growing out of their butts.
In no time, the newness of the casino will smell of stench.
Upstairs it has a combo of less-busy slots, a very small sports lounge, a grill, and the fabulous Joe Vicari's Andiamo Italian Steakhouse (http://www.yelp.com/biz/joe-vicaris-andiamo-italian-steakhouse-las-vegas#hrid:9O48n2_fS5nI4_fqBgSPbQ).
The clientele is different downtown.
Skews older, smokers,and tourists with a lower budget.
Again, for the price...it is great.
I booked to stay here again in a couple of weeks.

This was my first time staying in the downtown Fremont Street area of las vegas and i have to say that it may just be my last haha.
i only paid $44 a night with a group rate but when you tack on the $20 resort fee, the deal doesnt seem as good for what you actually get haha.
First, the D couldn't accommodate my request for a king bed, but they assured me a 'quiet room' on the 32nd floor.
even that high up though we could hear all the noise and commotion from Fremont Street.
luckily we were out late so it didnt interfere with our sleep...but the walls are so thin that we could hear housekeeping vacuuming the room next door bright and early, could hear the tv blasting from our neighbors and even their coughing/sneezing and toilet flushes.
not cool haha.
The D is essentially a motel trying to be a fancy hotel but it just doesnt work.
everything still looks old - our room didnt even have central a/c haha and the elevators are super slow.
i was almost tempted to go up/down 32 flights of stairs b/c it took so long...only bright spot is the location of the hotel where you have lots of cool bars/restaurants and other casinos within a block radius.
also blackjack tables are $5 and the dealers are really nice...but other than that, i'll take my nice 4-star hotel on the strip any day haha

My girlfriend and I had a great time at the D. We stayed for four nights and it was great the rooms were very nice and the staff was very friendly going out of there way to help us.
The D is close to plenty of entertainment and Andiamo's Italian Steak House is a great place to eat.
Also The D is close to plenty of bars and the Fremont Experience was the best not as crowded as the strip but just as much fun if not more.
Would recommend this place to any one.

It's an older casino remodeled and refreshed that's the bottom line here...
Decent selection of slots.. famous Long Bar that is well long lol.. free slot play on new member sign up's which I didn't win on but hey it's free and show's there type of interest in getting new card members in the place.. Upstairs they have a coin slot area with the famous Sigma Derby!
If anything Sigma Derby in the casino raises the stakes cause it's such a cool fun and rare game to enjoy..
The D is a hip casino on Fremont street that add's some flare to the ever changing downtown.

Great hotel!
Well updated, location is awesome, right on Fremont so you are a few steps from everything that's going on downtown Vegas.
Great price too.
Highly recommend it to anyone who is going to Vegas to have a good time!

I was not given water when asked because I was not staying at this hotel.
THIS IS RIDICULOUS!!
I came into the hotel with my first drink of the day and  gambled for about three hours with my boyfriend.
When I went to the bar to ask for water they asked if i was staying there.
With a puzzled look on my face I said no because my thought was, what does that have to do with the water, the bartender said they have a policy that they cannot give away water.
I told him I had been gambling for three hours and I still can't get a water??
He shrugged his shoulders and said sorry I can't help you the walked away.
This made me feel terrible for even wanting to gamble and enjoy my time here.
I left furious!

Best casino in the Downtown/Fremont Street.
Better ventilation and cleaner/happier feeling than the other old casinos in that area.
And, feels like the Detroit area casinos on the inside - seems like they have the same slot machines.
Super glad they have American Coney Island :)

Stayed here for two nights a couple weeks ago.
Booked a Premium Corner King room...it was $80 on Saturday and $50 on Sunday.
Pretty cheap but they do come cheaper!
I got a room on the 17th floor.
My room was in a separate section of the floor that was secured, which was nice (that wing had what they considered "junior" suites, even though I think they might have had some full suites there too).
It had an awesome view of Downtown and the Valley which was cool - even better at night.
Bath and Body Works toiletries, a double shower, nice low-rider toilet, VERY comfortable bed.
Used the valet a bunch...they were pretty quick and professional.
Good guys.
Check-in at the front desk was quick and painless.
Easy access to Fremont Street and cheap gambling.
The only thing that sucks about the place - and it's sister property the Golden Gate (another hotel that I enjoy) is the whole RESORT fee business.
The whole reason I like to stay in Downtown Vegas is to avoid those...but it seems like resort fees are trickling up from The Strip slowly but surely...

With a name like The D, the jokes just write themselves, don't they?
I'm actually kind of bummed that no one in their marketing department has run with that, considering they have no qualms about calling their main bar "The Long D"... which is fairly self-explanatory.
That being said, this place is pure chaos.
You have to wind your way through 6 floors of reserved valet parking to find a spot, and corners are blind without any mirrors, and lanes are narrow.
Additionally, if the garage is completely full there is no signage nor any employees posted to prevent new cars from entering- I experienced this unique brand of frustration during a visit over the summer.
This garage should have been added onto during the reno, as each floor is small and probably maxes out at 50 spaces.
For the parking situation alone, I would not stay here.
Once you finally make it in the casino (an assumption, perhaps), I will say that it isn't as smoky as I expected from all of the other reviews here- then again, all of the doors are open to the Fremont Experience and there was a good breeze going.
As I navigated my way to the showroom, employees were few and far between, and those I could find were fairly clueless and most were just standing around- one in particular was wandering the floor with a broom and dustpan in tow and was literally walking slower than a woman with a walker, and kept getting bumped into by patrons who were simply trying to get around the two of them and on their merry way.
On the bright side, the showroom is upstairs and away from most of the hustle and bustle- but they're not particularly organized, either.
I was able to pick up my tickets immediately and was spared the line, but I was late (due to the garage situation) and arrived just as it was supposed to start- and yet, the line was wound around the entire floor to accommodate the huge line because no one had yet been allowed into the showroom.
After the alleged start time.
On the bright side, as I left, I was not charged for parking despite a giant sign in self-park saying it was $2/hour.
I also consider it a positive that the garage exit is run entirely by a single computerized gate rather than a person in a booth.
I prefer technology to the quality of casino employee found in such positions.
But I'm sure tech issues happen and the exit gets backed up sometimes, but today, thankfully, it was working.

I got a comp and decided to try this place.
When I called to make reservation, I asked if there was a resort fee and was told no.
When I checked in, I tried to confirm this and was told I wouldn't be charged one.
I replied "great, so it's waived!".
Check in person says "no, you're not being charged".
So whats the diff?
Basically no fee wifi.
Yes, you read that right ...
I would have to pay $10 for wifi.
On principal, thats total BS.
In 2014, thats the same as charging per square of toilet paper.
FFF the D.  Here's an idea .. charge ONE price that covers all basics.
And if you comp someone, make sure basics like running water and wifi are included.
The casino is also a smokey ass dump with horrible "club" music at too high of volume.
When companies pull this crap and try to screw customers, I reply in kind.
I barely played there even though I was given 3 comped nights.
I spent 90+% of my downtown gaming at Downtown Grand.
Room was clean even if interior was dated.
2 stars is being generous ... not awful enough for one.

Pros and Cons of D hotel -  I give it .....a D.   Pros  Cheap Good location if on the strip semi modernized compared to other Fremont hotels  Cons: bathroom has no vent - poopoo smell stays forever no coffee or coffee maker ancient parking very narrow - hard to park for larger cars Windows facing Fremont street are super loud with noise until early morning Even elevated views from windows are semi blocked by terrible net-like cover -either for sun blocking crude way or for some advertising small elevators are almost always full and make scary noises

Brilliant name.
No, no, it's called that because the guy who owns it is from Detroit (nudge, nudge, wink, wink).
The Detroit casino experience in Las Vegas - saves you from having to travel to Detroit for your gambling fix  They have a wonderful coney island in the casio.

This review is for the hotel only.
I give it 3 stars only because they turned off the water from 12-5am for maintenance and the room was on the 3rd floor and all you could hear was thumping music from 8pm on.
Clean, modern rooms with a cute red.
Plenty of towels and they have Bath and Body toiletries which are nice.
The smoking room has ample ashtrays and matches.
The elevators for the hotel is conveniently located across from the elevators for the parking garage.

Picked up a suite last minute for a birthday and it didn't disappoint, the corner suit is super retro and different (to say the least).
The only problems i had weren't the Hotel's fault, more or less the madness on the Fremont that pushed me to give this a 4-star, but besides that what can you say?
You get what you pay for, i recommend staying in the hotel, the rest i can't really comment on...

To say the least, I'm impressed with The D Las Vegas.
I've been coming to Vegas two or three times each year since 2008, and have always opted to stay on the strip.
However, when hearing about the renovations going on at The D, my friends and I figured we'd give staying downtown a shot.
CHECK-IN The check-in process went off without a hitch.
Granted our flight landed at 8:30am local time and we had to check our bags in since our room wasn't ready, the front desk called my on my cell phone when the room was ready (approx.
2:30) so we could come officially check-in.
ROOM Overall the room was nice.
It's about the size of your standard hotel room, two queen beds, a desk, chair, one person sofa (not a recliner) type of seat, a little front area with an ironing board, and a nice bathroom.
I also like the colors of the refurbished rooms.
The reds, blacks and greys stuck out at me for some reason and I liked them.
CASINO The casino was my favorite part of my experience at The D.  Even if you do not stay here (or downtown for that fact), you should really stop in and check it out if you're at the Fremont Street Experience.
Almost all the time you can expect to find lower table limits ($5), as well as some higher table limits ($25+) in their high limit lounge.
I also personally loved the energy within the casino between the dancers and the music.
You also need to venture up to the casino on the second floor of The D, titled 'Vintage Vegas'.
They have slot machines that pay out in actual coins (US Currency) and they have a rare but working Sigma Derby machine which is a blast to play!
AMENITIES The pool is nothing to brag about, just a square pool with a few chairs and sunbathing beds.
The restaurants at The D are good, and I enjoyed going to The D Grill every morning for breakfast.
If it's in your budget, be sure to try the Andiamo Steakhouse, it may not compare to some steakhouses on the strip, but it's still top notch.

This review is based on my overall customer service experience with employees at "The D."  I called to have a bottle of champagne delivered to a group of my girlfriends, who were in Vegas for a few days while I studied.
I wanted to do something nice for them to show them that I was there in spirit(s).
Haha!
Anyway, I called and spoke with the operator, who said that she didn't know whom I should speak with to order the bottle, so she transferred me to the front desk.
The front desk told me 'we don't have amenities" and acted like I was crazy for wanting to order a bottle of champagne to be sent to a room....  Um, I just looked at the website, which shows people partying it up, and touts the fun that Bachelor and Bachelorette parties can have at The D.  What party isn't complete without people being able to send you champagne, right?
Anyway, so she asked around and then told me I would need to speak with the concierge, who might be able to find a local florist to deliver a flower arrangement for me.
Yeah....because alcohol and flowers are the same, right?
Not in my universe.
Anyway, so I got bumped over to the Concierge, who also seemed annoyed at my request.
Having worked in the hotel business myself, I was surprised at the lack of support or innovative ideas/solutions presented by the concierge at The D.  I tried to help her brainstorm by asking her if I could buy a bottle at a bar or restaurant and send up a note or something, but my ideas were dismissed in a huff.
She put me on hold, then told me she was transferring me back to the operator and that I am to tell the operator to transfer me to "Food and Beverage.
"  Nice....so the concierge doesn't have a phone list?
Or doesn't know how to warm transfer a call?
So I get popped back to the operator and tell her the concierge's request (literally, a game of telephone), and the operator tells me that there is no Food and Beverage department.
Ha!
She tells me that there is a "Food Department" and a "Beverage Department," of which I chose to be transferred to the latter.
After being transferred, I spoke with someone in the Beverage Department, who did not know how to process my request, so he found a co-worker named Anthony, who was happy to help me (at last).
He took down my information and I asked that the bottle be delivered between 5:00-6:00 p.m. to coincide with my friends' arrival time.
In the morning, I got a text from my friend, asking if I had sent them champagne?
Apparently, it was delivered at 2:00 a.m., and when they told the man that they didn't order it, he shrugged his shoulders and walked out, and they were very confused because there was no information on the order and they thought there had been a mix-up.
So, long story short, their customer service has a lot to brush up on, and I hope that they do since all good hotels and casinos should know how to "keep the champagne flowing.

It's an old place that's been polished new IMHO.
It's noisy, smokey..came home with bronchitis and the flu.. Not my fave on Fremont.
I probably would never stay the night here but not  bad to pop in and grab drinks.

Where do I even start?
Resort fees.
They are on the high side for Vegas ($20/night) and not a lot to show for it.
According to vegaschatter.com it covers WiFi, $10 off the D showroom tickets, and local and toll free calls.
I also got a $5 coupon for The D Grill, but as the food there wasn't that good, I'd call the coupon a wash.  Not worth it, to be honest.
Then, I booked a king, and was given two queens.
When I argued that, I was told that being I booked through hotels.com my room preference could not be guaranteed.
That's bullshit, as the hotel was nowhere close to being at capacity, and she offered to UPGRADE me to a king which means they were available.
I had that happen to me only once before when I had booked through hotels.com, but it was at a MUCH shadier hotel, and I'm surprised they pulled that shit in Vegas.
But whatever, I was willing to let that go, not the end of the world.
The casino itself is pretty standard, and pretty boring.
Nothing to write home about, and other than the dancing girls, nothing that really catches the eye.
Pretty bland.
The hotels rooms are okay.
My room wasn't completely clean, but it wasn't filthy (lipstick smudge on the mirror, and some greasy spots on one of my headboards).
Though what hotel these days doesn't come standard with a mini-fridge?
The beds aren't the comfiest I've ever slept on, but not the worst.
Not what I'm used to with Vegas hotels though.
Pillows were fairly comfortable.
The worst, the WORST thing was the noise.
The walls are paper thin.
You can hear everything.
The guy in the room next to me had a bit of a cough.
I could hear when someone in the other room sneezed.
Want to know what your neighbor is watching on their (tiny) TV?
No problem, because you can hear it clearly at normal volume.
I was woken up in the middle of the night because one of my neighbors was rather, um, enthusiastic about their bedroom activities.
And if the noise from your neighbors isn't enough to keep you up at night, the knocking noise your sink makes whenever they used water will.
It probably has one of the worse parking lots I've used in Las Vegas.
The lanes between floors are steep and narrow, the turns are tight, and guest parking doesn't START until the 7th floor.
No pedestrian walk-ways either, so unless you're parked near the elevators you're taking your life into your own hands walking through the (very very narrow) parking lot.
I will never, ever stay here again.
The only reason it gets two stars is because it was clean enough, and the beds were tolerable.
I would not recommend this hotel to anyone, and will go one step further to recommend you stay at another hotel.

Great for the price.
It's easy to get downstairs and get food any time at all.

OMG.
...where do I start?
OK we usually stay at the Golden Nugget whenever we come to Vegas but The D was recommended by some friends and we also liked the vibe of the casino, young, hip and vibrant.
So upon check in we waited for the bell hop for 20 mins we finally gave up and lugged all our luggage and ice chest in ourselves.
Then waited in line for another 30 mins to check in because they only had 1 person working at the desk..ON A FRIDAY....  Then we finally get to our room and were blown away at how utterly tiny the room was, we booked a corner suite but got a freakin broom closet.
The room was not the same room as pictured on the website.
So the hubby went downstairs to speak to a manager about our complaints but it took her a half hour to get to him cuz she was on a phone call.
She was very unprofessional and said that we got a good deal and we should enjoy ourselves in Vegas.
The couch had stains all over it and the shower head was barely hanging on by a thread.
Bathroom tile was filthy.
We would NEVER recommend this dump 2 any of our ppl.

Great spot on Fremont.
New, Good Bars, Food is above avg.
Its Fremont, so that's good!

Honestly I swore I would never go into the old Fitz again...but after reading some reviews I decided to give them another chance and what a good idea that was!!
I will start with the PROS,, I was so excited I forgot to take pics but there are plenty on here.
They have taken the bold Red and black "Vintage Vegas" theme ..and painted this old girl up and she is a beauty!!
Now I am not going to pretend shes perfect but the "Premium" room we booked was clean, and comfortable.
We had a corner room so the views were all around.
we were on the 14th floor and above the stage area and THAT was a problem.
I know to ask for the other side of the hotel from now on.
We had a Jacuzzi tub...and a nice large bath room.
Again, the linens, new paint and flat screened TV...made her barely recognizable from that last time we stayed there.
Down stairs was beautiful!
The Long Bar was nice...great service and Flair bartenders outside were awesome too.
They had "dancing dealer girls" ...ehh...they were "OK"...but at least it created attention and it was fun.
(HEY where are the dancing GUYS?
?..LOL) The D Grille was part of the makeover and served up delicious breakfasts (Which is the only meals we ate there) Service was excellent.
There is a Coney Hot Dog stand downstairs that is awesome too!
of course McDonalds is right on site.
Everything is clean and new and most of the great slots I love were still there.
Not NEARLY smokey as the old Fitz...AND it has a younger vibe all around.
The greatest rehab of all was the great attitude of all employees I ran into!!
Now the CONS: I already mentioned the noise level from the 14th floor was bad while the band performed....I could barely hear the TV..lol NEXT I paid extra to get a room with a refrigerator which NEVER cooled one thing...that was bad but ...I didn't complain...I should Have..
But it was a good experience!
Don't get me wrong its a budget hotel so you are not getting the Wynne but you get a great deal and a great location!
I never figured out what the RESORT FEE paid for.
It is conveniently located to the Deuce  and Walgreens (Ahhh a familiar face) is just steps away.
also...The Freemont Experience is right outside the door.

smoky and old inside...not really a fan

I wasn't impressed.
Casino is dirty and still has that run down feeling.
I wanted to like it being from the "real" D, but I'm just not a fan.
The Coney Island was OVERPRICED and so so.

This place has terrible customer service.
There is only one manager on duty at the front desk.
If u have any problems here they wont be resolved.

Have been here a couple of times and each time I order something new each time.
Never been disappointed at this point.
If you are in the mood for a fruity salad order the strawberry chicken salad.
It's big enough for you to even split it with a friend.
The nachos are fantastic and just enought to split between three people and still have room for your lunch or dinner.

This is my second time in Vegas and my first time on Fremont.
I booked through southwest vacations and honestly wasn't expecting much due to the cheap price.
im in a standard smoking room with A king bed.
the rooms are very dull but clean.
however when housekeeping comes they don't do anything except make the bed.
tv is small but it works (only gets about 10 channels).
the WiFi works good.
the beds are not comfortable but the pillows are okay.
the absolute worst thing about this place is the elevator wait times.
that may sound snoody or whatever but when you're waiting 10 minutes (timed) for an elevator either which way it's just absolutely ridiculous.
Also- this isn't the hotel for you if you're looking to get a great nights sleep because not only are the walls thin but the windows face Fremont and all the festivities.
Plan on taking an hour long shower.
Once you set the water at temperature preference, it most definitely won't stay that way.
It will turn scortching hot every minute or so.
It's smart to not stand in the direct line of water, it's that bad.

The d's two stars because the valets are awesome!
They are the only people in the hotel that has excellent customer service!!
I book two rooms when I got there @ 3:00p one of the rooms was ready the other would not be ready till later on.
Fine I got the first room there was dirty underwear in the bath tub, I thought the maids clean up guess not.
As I was telling the person @ the front desk that I needed to speak to housekeeping manager my husband opened the dresser drawer and found a magazine with a white powdery substance on it.
Horrified to say the least.
The manager came and just gave us a fridge, big deal.
I asked them to clean the bathroom again they never did.
These rooms are dirty and they have a horrible odor..
I will never stay @ this dump again.. To bad I love down town...
But this place sucks...
Thanks again to the valet!!
You guys rock!!

My money lasted the longest here.
I played poker for about 3 hours straight.
The staff is AMAZING, everyone is super friendly, good moods all around!
Great music and girls wearing next to nothing dancing on tables!!!!
Super fun place!

Staff was friendly and knowledgeable, the rooms were spotless, the location was great, and the price was perfect.
BTW - this was the ONLY casino we won a little at.
I loved it so much - I'll be back for sure.
BTW I love the old slot machines and video games from say, 10 years ago or older.
I hate the new 1 cent video machines that (when you play max credits) are actually $175-$3 a pop.
Ridiculous.
If you like the older type of machines be sure to to check out their VINTAGE VEGAS 2nd floor!

Stayed on 33rd floor.
Very windy and view wasnt that great.
$10 black jack was good though.
Parking is bad.
You have to park 7th floor or above unless you are using valet since 2nd to 6th floor parking lots are reserved for valet only.

I will never be back here, very rude staff at checkin, valet, and service.
This is an old crappy motel that has a new coat of paint and a new name.
Awful!

I got a great deal for $11 a night so it was a no brainer, especially after seeing the cool remodeled outside before, and reading some reviews.
Have to say I was quite pleased!!
Rooms were nice and clean, bed was comfy.
Dining options are slim being that there is a really high end (expensive) Italian steakhouse, then there is the D grille, which is very affordable with average food, then a McDonald's and a hot dog joint.....but we didn't mind being that it's Fremont st with plenty other options within walking distance.
We didn't gamble much (pennies only) so I can't speak on that much.
But casino is layed nice with all gaming options.
Check in and out was a breeze, customer service was great.
The long bar is cool, especially if you love your sports.
Best of it all is that it is smack dab on Fremont st...where all the action is.
There is a stage right outside the front entrance with nightly cover bands, which are darn good!
Only reason I gave it 4 stars is because the pool is nothing special, Its on the back side where all the buses, and cars pull in, and I felt like I was at the pool at my apartments.
They should really try and remodel it or at least buy some nice patio furniture.
But other then that for $22 for two nights(Mon.
& tues.) + $40 resort fee, you can't beat it!

Big fan of this hotel.
Ive stayed here once.
Cool casino & it has Coney Island Hot Dogs!
Must have.

really comfy beds, really clean and nice rooms.
the only problem is the long time u wait to get an elevator down sometimes took forever.
but it was close to everything I wanted to get to and all around a good time.

Girl casino dealers can wear bikini tops....enough said.
Our dealer was in training and even though we are 33 and 35 we were carded.
That's fine I guess but the atmosphere is different and we lost money so not my favorite spot.

Visiting for the weekend for daughters softball tournament.
Found this hotel on Vegas.com.
Paid $105 for Fri and Sat night then when we arrived paid additional resort fee of $22 night ( includes free WiFi) So total just under $150 which is not bad.
But found this deal about 3 weeks in advance.
As the date came closer to our travel date the prices increased.
Staff was great, bellman were courteous and the valet service was awesome!
On Sundays the elevators run slow especially at check out time.
We stopped about 10 times because everyone is trying to check out by noon.
WiFi did not work for me.
Rooms were nice, nothing fancy, but clean.
Beds were ok. Also the toiletries are from bath and body works which is a plus.
We were so busy with the tournament we didn't have a chance to explore the hotel but from our room (30th floor) you could see Fremont Street and hear the live music.
FYI not a place for kids.
Just driving through to get to the hotel I saw a topless big breasted woman with pasties and a cowboy wearing a thong.. lol Also some homeless hanging around.
Overall would stay again for a quick trip.

May as well find the stairs.
This place is a pit.
Got drinks at the bar after waiting 45 minutes for the elevator to find BUGS in my drink.
The bartender was "trying" to do the flair style bartending, but he failed miserably.
They say this has been remodeled, perhaps the casino - which is very tight, but the rooms probably only got new curtains.
You can hear everything on Fremont street til 4 am.
When we checked in, under reservations made through the hotel - not a 3rd party!
- we were told they had given all king beds away and couldn't give us any comp or drink coupon or anything by downgrading us to a queen.
This won't be a reoccurring stop on our MANY vegas trips.

When talking Fremont St, the D Las Vegas is second to none for entertainment, food, fun and gambling.
The staff is friendly and attentive and the great mix of working flair used by the bartenders, is a show in itself.
If you haven't checked out the D yet, make sure to do it on your next Vegas Trip!
P.S.
The frequent celebrity sightings at the D can make for some truly one of a kind Vegas nights!

Stayed here in May.
Very clean room and friendly staff.
Price is pretty reasonable.I will definitely stay here again.
Only draw back is the noise from the Fremont Experience at night,but it isn't too bad.

So was convinced by husband that staying in Vegas during our road trip to Hoover Dam was a good idea.
And in some ways he was right.
The D on Fremont Street was VERY affordable $15 per night plus the resort fee via Hotels.com.
so a total of $37 per night meant we could get two rooms instead of sharing with the kids.
The front desk even made sure we had adjoining rooms.
The rooms were clean and reasonably updated.
Except for the shower tub combo from the 70s which was probably one of the original spa tubs ever made.
The nozzles were large and rusted looking.
Since we were only showering it really did not matter but the price makes more sense with that tub situation.
Beds were comfortable and we slept well.
Breakfast in the hotel on the 2nd floor was OK.  Of course it is Vegas so you have to tolerate the smell of smoke everywhere.
Coming from California it does take some time to get used to it.
Interesting characters in the casino.
Overall good value

My first time coming back here and it was a great experience.
Had a lot of fun and the noise wasn't an issue.
It was pretty awesome.
Definitely will return again.
The D Grill is also a good stop for good food and affordable prices.
I also loved the rooms now compared to when it was the Fitz.
They certainly upgraded a lot and added more than I had my last visit.
This place will still remain one of my favorite hotels.

I was very looking forward to staying at the D hotel after all they have a pool.
First of I want to say that everyone who isn't a manager is AWESOME they are polite, friendly, and genuinely seem happy to make sure you are having a good time.
They got the Hotel my 2 stars!While we were there we attempted to use the WiFi but it asked me for my credit card, and then I looked at the little packet where I got my key cards and it said WiFi available  ask for rates.
So I assumed I was mistaken about the free WiFi.
Then apon check which I attempted on the TV it said I owed almost $70.00 Dollars in resort fees.
No don't get me wrong I am very used to resort fees but I am used to them in better hotels and you actually get services for your money.
I did call down to the "guest services" and they informed me that the resort fee covered Free Wifi (WTF), Free local calls (who doesn't have a cell phone?
), and the coupons I got with my key card.
Seriously $22.00/per day+tax for Wifi I couldn't get into, calls NOONE needs to make and coupons which I believe was bogo fora lame show, and something about Keno.
(Who plays keno when you under 90?
) When I called down to see what could be done I got a very snotting -well your checking out-- so why bother being nice to you now ?
attitude.
I finally called back and talked to someone else who was nice enough to remove one of the charges.
I am still not very pleased.
I don't mind when I have to pay for things but I expect something in return.
The casino is small and after about an hour I felt like I played everything.
(A lot of repeating games) Also the D Club (the players club) and the gift store no where near the room elevators, neither are the bathrooms.
It would be nice to walk out of the elevator and find such things right away, that way I could spend more money.
I actually went across to the Fremont's gift shop to buy something because I couldn't find ours.
The ELEVATORS are not for the faint of heart.
They are a little small (which is okay) but add to that the fact that they shake and rattle as they go down.
I want to gamble in Vegas just not with my life.
We did stop in to the Coney Island Hot Dogs they were ok ... not great, not bad, just ok. Like getting hot dog at the mall, again staff there amazing.
I couldn't find the other restaurant there.
The Room was very nice and the maid was great.
I would have preferred to have a table in there vs a desk.
We had to eat sitting on our beds.
The pool it is a salt pool which is great, it was warm enough for me to get in a plus, the Jacuzzi was nice, but there was a note in the room letting you know that towels are at the pool and that you shouldn't take them from the room.
But when I got to the pool at noon on Friday, there was a rack for towels but no towels and there aren't any employee's right there, in fact you have to cross the driveway where you valet your car to get there (literally dodging cars.
and man the pool needs at least a mini bar, and drink service.
Also it closes at 7pm which is a bummer because I like to dip in the Jacuzzi after a night of gambling.
All in all it was okay but I think next year when I go I will be choosing a different Hotel and Will not be returning to the D.

Kristy at the front desk was very sweet and got us checked in right away!
It's nice that after a long drive, I can stop here and get all the accommodations I need for one evening.
Room was clean, no complaints at all!

The hubby and I just got back from Vegas.
We spent our last night at The D because he wanted me to experience downtown Las Vegas.
I have to admit that I was extremely skeptical going in, especially once we got off the highway.
The front desk staff was friendly and the room was pretty inexpensive, although the resort fee of $22 was almost as much as our room.
That's a pretty steep resort fee for downtown.
I mean, we paid $28 the previous nights at Cosmopolitan, and these two hotels are like night and day.
The room was clean, although the tub was missing some of the porcelain and the shower would not stop dripping all night.
You can definitely hear the noise from the Fremont Street Experience from your room (we were on the 10th floor).
We just turned on the A/C though, and it drowned out the noise.
The location is awesome if you want to experience the FSE, you step right outside and you're right there.
The 3rd street stage is literally right in front of you.
We sat down in the casino to play some black jack and had a fun time.
They even let you order Grey Goose!
That definitely made me a happy camper.
Especially after drinking Stoli at a Harrah's property (Flamingo).
The dining options are good as well.
We ate dinner at Joe Vicari's Andiamo Steakhouse and loved it (I'll write a separate review).
Got breakfast at D Grill, and they also have a McDonald's on the property too.
When we checked in they gave us a $5 coupon off a meal at D Grill, which made breakfast really inexpensive.
Overall, I was impressed.
I definitely had a good experience downtown at The D.

This is one of the worse hotel I've ever stayed at in Las Vegas.
Let me list the things that made mr give them a 1 star review: 1) Upon arrival and checking in, i was told that there will be an additional charge of $23 per night on top of what I have already pre paid when I booked this package online.
2) When I got to the room, the locks on the door that lead to the next room, was not lockable.
I tried to push the door, turn the knob and lock it but it would not go through.
I told them about it and they got their Engineers in to fix it for me.
3) The elevators are terruble.
They have a total of 4 and they run so slow.
I had to wait from 10 to 15 minutes for 1 of the 4 to open as soon as I hit the button.
4) Their TV only has 1 channel.
The rest is just sbowing blurry background with a message stating no signal.
5) The room smells pretty bad.
6) The sink is clogged and the water doesn't drain fast enough.
7) Their WiFi access code doesnt work!
8) They don't have deadbolt lock on their door.
They used the 70`s type chain instead.
This is my first and last time at this hotel.
I would rather paid that extra $200 to be at the hotels on the strip than to pay less with hidden charges that is equivalent to the price of the hotel on the strip.
This hotel is in Downtown and I don't like this area where I don't feel safe.

My cousins and I decided to rent 3 rooms at this hotel & casino because it was the cheapest one at the freemont street experience.
We stayed Saturday June 14-16.
Saturday night $49 & Sunday night $22 so that was perfect AND then they hit us with a resort fee of $22.50 per night for wifi :/ .
.we asked to get the resort fee waived because we all have internet on our cell phones plus we were going to party and only be in the room to sleep.
Unfortunately, they said they had to charge us.
So with tax and resort fee it was $125ish for two nights and 3days.
This fee was for standard rooms, meaning that its for the lower level rooms (floors 2-20).
We all opted to get rooms at a higher floor so that was an additional $10 per night (plus 13% tax).
We also opted for a late check out for  Monday at 3pm that was $16.95 with tax.
So total we paid $165 per room.
We got two rooms on floor 29 (double beds) & 1 room on the 31st floor (king bed).
The bf and I got the room on the 31st floor and we had the "luxury" of getting a fridge (that never cooled our beer!!
), a sofa bed, coffee table with two chairs, & a view (not great).
Other reviewers have complained about the noise level at night, problems with the elevators, & the parking structure.
My only complaint is about the parking.
Valet parking right now is from level 1-7.
But no one ever parked their cars there and driving up and down the parking structure up to the 10th floor was nauseating.
FYI- emphasize that you are paying for a late check out so that you can sleep in and recuperate from the sleepless nights!!!
House keeping knocked twice Monday morning!!!!
SMH!!
Overall, our stay was great and we would stay here again IF we were to stay in DTLV again & we were on a budget (I would rather stay at the strip though ;) ) .

The prime rib was special the night we had dinner at the D Grill and it was seasoned well, only downfall is I like my cut rare as possible.
They even got a Hawaii menu, bonus!!
Oxtail soup, loco moco and couple other stuff.
Hotel is energetic with hip-hop music playing through the casino.
The Long Bar is really a long bar lots of tv screens with every sport covered.
Room are decent, will have to spoil myself next time with their suites..Awesome location if you're in Downtown LAS.

I got a deal on hotels.com & was curious how they renovated this spot.
It's clean & gorgeous.
The beds are so comfy & luxurious.
How could i beat this for $25/night?
I would definitely recommend this hotel!

Everything is awesome here.
I've read the reviews and agree with them.
I love it here.
Just booked again in august!

Formerly the Fitzgerald inside wise not much changed layout was pretty much the same i rather hang at the other Casinos i was never a fan of Fitzgerald only that they had ice cream lol gambling wise i play elsewhere.
Maybe the only thing would be watching the gogo dancers behind the gaming tables lol funny how this place and the Vegas Club does that what's more distracting gogo dancers shaking their booty while you're playing Black Jack haha advantage the casino haha.

No late night food!!
Only McD...
Need a late night breakfast to soak up alcohol!
Great music while you play and drink!
Good ambiance and dancers.
Two levels of play.
Oh the bartender does tricks while serving which is cool to watch!

Great hotel for the price of $35 when on a spur of the moment trip to Las Vegas.
Room was clean.
Beds were comfortable and we slept well.
They do charge for the in room coffee and water.
The room did not have a refrigerator or lock box safe.
The hotel does not have a buffet so plan on eating elsewhere if that is what you ate looking for.
Table minimums trended towards the $10 range but other properties had $5 and lower.
Drink service was poor and they only seemed to have one server.

This is an old hotel in the middle of downtown Vegas.
The rooms have been remodeled so the furniture is new and nice (as seen from the pictures) HOWEVER, they did NOT update the AC.
The AC is an extremely old wall mounted unit that is EXTREMELY loud.
Besides that, great place to stay on the cheap, just be prepared to pay an extra $22.50 resort fee per day.

The  hotel was  really great  I stayed there and enjoyed it and the outside attractions to the maxx

So now i went and stayed it was ok the bar was reallu cool joe the bartrnder was not only cool but nice and welcoming now the valet staff is crap bad attudue even after you tip themI've read and heard good review about this place the customer service on the phone was HORRIBLE as I asked some questions about early check in because I am going to a wedding and asked if I can have 2 beds not only was she rude but hung up on me only reason I'm staying here is because it's cheap and last minute let's hope the place is as good as I've read and heard but the customer service was CRAP

Stayed here 4yrs ago when it was the Fitz.
Huge difference & what an upgrade.. 4yrs ago the rooms were equivalent to a Motel 6 with a cheap casino connected.
Not my cup of tea & therefore hadn't returned.
Well the Mrs, my Boss / wife's gf decided to celebrate her husbands  B/D with a comp room  for themselves @ the new D.  So now my " Boss " wants Us to celebrate with them also.
Problem!!
We don't have a comp room & I'll be damn if I'm paying to stay @ the " D " in the same condition as the Old Fitz!!
So between Yelp & any other travel forum I could get a review I did some research b4 I was gonna spend my money on an updated Fitz.
Well what a SURPRISE.
From arriving @ the Valet parking with no charge & very quick service.
So leave a good tip.
Parking is very tough n that area.
To check-in with no problems & fast prompt service.
We arrived around 2pm & they let us ( my wife & I ) check out the room 1st & we could change if there was a problem.
Matter of fact we did change from the original room they gave us.
Upon examining the new room my wife didn't like the view & with no problem we were reassigned back to the original room based on the Bell Asst.
Homers insisting that it was a better room view & location wise.
Thx.
Homer!!
He new if the Mrs / Boss is happy then I'll be happy.
To the elevators that were nicely redecorated with a new D ambiance.
Yes Homer the Bell attendant who was very helpful & informative.
Our room was the Deluxe Corner King.
Remodeled, very spacious, pull out sofabed, decent view of Fremont St. & a bed that was awwwww so comfy.
After losing money, getting drunk from free shots of cognac ( ?
) & walking Fremont St. looking @ the weirdos & hustlers for hours.
A  hug from that comfortable bed & my sexy a$$ wife was well needed.
Cons: Coney Island Hotdog was good but pricey.
$4 for a hotdog??
I had 3.
It's hard to get a good Hotdog n Cali & I'm originally from NY.
So I paid the price.
We stayed till Monday.
Didn't wanna deal with the Vegas traffic heading back to Cali on Sunday when everyone & their mother is checking out of every hotel in Vegas.
So we checkout apprx.
2am Monday.
Well there was no Bell service.
I had to leave my D/L  @ the Courtesy Desk in exchange for a luggage rack.
Kinda tacky if ur tryn to give off the appearance of a Higher End Hotel.
No I should say " Higher End Hotel Resort " since they charge a Resort fee.
All in all if ur looking for a 4 star Hotel in the Fremont St area of Vegas U can't go wrong with the D. Book early.
Rooms can get a little pricey for Vegas if U last minute book.

